One of the characteristics that you have as a TEDster is that you live your calling and take responsibility for it.
They really engage in the topics that you move.
But what you'll ultimately find out is that you need a few politicians to help you.
How do you do that?
Something I should tell you: I used to work for the Discovery Channel, and that somehow changed my character.
If you start thinking about politicians, you must realize that they are strange creatures.
Besides that, they don't know where it goes and have strange sexual practices - how do you deal with that? What we need to understand is the question: What is the political species doing?
There are two fundamental things in a politician's heart. One is respect and influence.
They are the basic tools with which a politician can work.
The second is (unlike most animals, where it is the instinct of survival) the self-preservation.
You may think it is money, but it is really only a substitute for doing what I get.
Now, the challenge to present your request, consists in the fact that these animals are constantly being overwhelmed with messages.
What doesn't work is to make your problem important.
You can send them an email.
I get so much Viagra-advertising that your email will go to spam.
She doesn't care, she's spam.
What about a phone call?
Well, I happen to have an automatic that takes in and says, "Yes, they have called and said they don't want this and that."
That doesn't bring anything.
A personal conversation would help, but it is difficult to arrange.
It is difficult to establish a connection and to bring the conversation to a conclusion.
Actually, donations do make a difference and they create an opportunity for a conversation, but it takes time.
What is it actually doing?
The answer is pretty weird.
It is a letter.
We live in a digital world, but we are quite analoge beings.
Letters actually work.
Even the boss himself takes the time to read 10 letters that his employees have chosen.
I can assure you that every functionary with whom I have worked is happy to tell you about the letters he receives, and how much they mean to him.
How do you write such a letter?
First, you need to take an analog device, a pen.
I know it's hard, and you'll have to work hard to get your fingers around it, but it's really important.
It is also important that you write the letter by hand.
It's very unusual to see someone actually take such an analog device and wrote to me.
I would like to recommend you to write to your palamentarier at least once a month.
I can promise you: If you do this consistently, you will call the Member of Parliament within three months, as soon as your topic comes up, and ask: "How do you think about it?"
I'll name you four points with which you can work.
If you approach these animals, you have to be aware that they have a dangerous side. You have to approach them with a certain amount of respect and caution.
Praise her!
Maybe they can't praise the person or anything else, but maybe they can praise the fact that the man has a self-confident appearance.
If animals want to win, they will also fight.
They don't waste time.
Please! Point number 2: You have to be honest and say what you really think.
But if you do that, you never hit someone personally, you only hit his tactics.
Ad hominem attacks don't work.
If animals are attacked or driven into a corner, they will fight until they die, so you must give them a way out.
If they are offered a way out, they will most likely take it.
Obviously you are intelligent.
If you had the right information, you would have done the right thing. After all, you want to improve something.
You are the safe harbor.
Say to people: "If no one gives you the necessary information, I will." Animals signalize what they are doing. They do two things. They warn you or they try to seduce you and say: "We must work together."
They do this by signing your letter.
They do a number of things, they are a vice president, they offer their help or do something else.
Why is that important?
Because those two primary criteria of the political tier are: that you have a large influence and that my self-sufficiency depends on you.
Here is the whole thing in a nutshell, especially for the FBI agents in the audience.
(Go ahead, if you're sending a letter)
First, send the original to the district office.
and the copy to the main office.
If they follow the protocol, they will call and ask the original.
A robot in the background writes the name on the envelope and says, "Oh, that's a very important letter."
And you land in the folder that the member really has to read.
What is your purpose in writing? I tell you, we are all in the same party, and politicians are the pinatas (puppets) of the party.
We are held captive by sermons and lectures, we are sold and marketed. A letter is really one of the few occasions where we can honestly communicate.
I got this letter here after my first election, and I still take it to every meeting.
This is a real opportunity for a real dialogue. And if you want to take responsibility and want to say something, this is a very effective form of dialogue.
If you choose this form, I can promise you that you will be the 800-pound gorilla in the forest.
Write!
Namaste. Salaam.
Peace.
Greetings to all from Pakistan.
We often say that we fear what we don't know.
Pakistan is, in this sense, pretty much the same.
because it has provoked and provoked an inner fear in the stomachs of many western souls. especially when it is viewed through the monochrome lenses of the unrest and tumult.
But there are many other dimensions in Pakistan.
What follows is a flood of images, a series of images, taken by some of the most recent and dynamic photographers of Pakistan, who try to convey an alternative view of them, a view into the hearts and minds of some ordinary Pakistanis.
Here are some of the stories they wanted to share with you.
I am Abdul Khan. I come from Peshawar.
I hope they don't just see my Taliban-like beard, but also the richness and the color of my perceptions, wishes and dreams, as rich and colorful as the pockets I sell.
I'm Meher and this is my friend Irim.
If I get older, I want to be a veterinarian so I can take care of the sick cats and dogs that roam the streets of my village in Gilgit, Pakistan, in the north.
I am Kailash, and I enjoy making life better with the help of technicolor glass.
Do you want one of these orange arm bands with pink flowers, my lady?
I am Zamin,
I'm an IDP, a refugee from the Swat district.
See me on the other side of this fence?
Do I exist for them?
Iman, and I am a model, a rising model from Lahore.
("Do you see me with a cloth?") ("Do you see me with a cloth?") ("Wie sieht es mit einem Stoff aus?") ("How does it look with a cloth?") ("Wie sieht es mit einem Stoff aus?") ("How does it look with a cloth?") ("Wie sieht es mit
Can they see through the veil and see who I really am?
I am Ahmed. I am a refugee from the Khyber Agency.
I came from a very dark place.
So I will enlighten the world.
I am Papu.
"My heart and my drum beat as one."
If religion is the opium of the masses, then for me, music is my only drug.
A rising tide lifts all boats.
has lifted more than 400 million Indians into an energetic middle class.
But there are more than 650 million Indians, Pakistanis, Sri Lankans, Bengalis, Nepalese, who are still living in poverty.
That's why in India and Pakistan, and in my case and yours, we have to overcome our differences and celebrate our diversity to derive benefit from our common humanity.
Our common view in Naya Jeevan, which for many of them, as they all recognize, is "new life" in Urdu and Hindi, is to make life for millions of families with low incomes to improve by providing them with affordable access to disaster medicine.
In fact, this is the world's first emerging urban insurance for urban working-class people in the developing world.
Why should we do this as Indians and Pakistanis?

If our fates converge, then we believe that this is good karma and good luck.
Our wealth is, in fact, at the bottom of the pyramid. Thank you.
"Stay here."
That was fantastic.
I found it very moving.
We know that we have fought a lot to get at least a small contingent of Pakistanis.
"I felt that it was really important."
They had to put up with a lot to get here.
Could you please stand up?
I just want to show myself to them.
Thank you very much.
Imagine standing somewhere in America and a Japanese person comes up to you and says, "Excuse me, what is the name of this building block?"
I don't understand you at all. This is Oak Street and that is Elm Street.
"This is the 26th and this is the 27th Street."
He says, "Okay. But what is the name of this house block?"
"Well, Blocks don't have names.
"Streets have names, blocks are just the un-named spaces between the streets."
A bit confused and disappointed, he leaves.
And now imagine you're standing somewhere in Japan, and you turn to someone next to you and say, "Excuse me, what's the name of this street?"
"Well, this is Block 18 and this is Block 16."
And you say, "Okay, but what's the name of this street?"
Well,
(Laughter) Houses have names.
Just look at the map of Google here. There's Block 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19.
All these houses have names. The streets are just unnumbered rooms between the blocks.
And then you say: "Okay, but how do you know your address?"
"It's just a matter of this here is the district eight.
"There is Block 17, House Number One."
"Okay. But when I was walking around the neighborhood, I noticed that the house numbers don’t go in order."
But yes, yes, they run in the order in which they were built.
The first house that's built in each block is house number one.
The second house is being built.
"The third is house number three. That's easy. And it's very logical."
I find it good that we sometimes have to travel to the other side of the world to see something that we didn't know we didn't know, and to notice that its opposite could be true as well.
There are doctors in China who think that their job is to keep us healthy.
You pay them every month, when you are healthy. But if you are sick, you don't have to pay them, because they have failed in their job. So they will be richer, when you are healthy, not when you are sick.
In most music we think of the emphasized beat as the beginning of the musical phrase. One, two, three, four.
But in West African music, the "eins" is the end of the sentence, like the dot at the end of a sentence.
Two, three, four, one.
This map is also correct.
(Laughter) There is a proverb that says that for every truth that is said about India, the opposite is also true.
We should never forget that, whatever brilliant ideas we have or hear, there is always the possibility that their opposite could be true.
Thank you very much.
I have a daughter, Mulan.
When she was eight years old, last year, she had to prepare a report or homework on frogs.
We were just sitting in a restaurant, when she asked me: "So, do frogs lay eggs, and from the eggs come frogs, and from the frogs come more frogs?"
"Yes, although I don't know much about frogs.
But I think it is the female who lays the eggs. And then the male fertilizes them.
And so then there are kaulquappen and frogs.
"What?", she asked, "only the females have eggs?"
"Yes", I said.
And what does "befrucht" mean?
"You know what, that's the little ingredient that you need to create a new frog from mother and father." And she: "Is that also the case with humans?"
And I thought, "Okay, now it's so far."
I didn't think it would come so early, already with 8.
Always answer the question.
"Yes."
And she asked: "But where, where do the human females lay their eggs, where do the women lay their eggs?"
"Well, yeah, it's weird that you asked that. We've developed our own pond."
We have our own pond in our body.
And there we put our eggs. We need to take care of them there so we don't have to take care of any other eggs or anything else.
"It's our private pond. Well, that's how it goes."
And then she says: "And how do they get fertilized?"
"Well, men fertilize eggs with sperm that comes out of their penis."
"And that goes through the vagina of the woman."
We were just having dinner when the doorbell rang. "Mama!", she called, = We were just having dinner when the doorbell rang.
"like where you make Pipi?"
"Exactly!" I said, "I have been to Tibet."
"I know!"
"So has this developed. Even though it may seem strange to you.
It's a bit like having a rubbish dump right next to a playground.
Bad city planning, but..." And she: "What? But, Mama, men and women never see themselves naked in life.
"How can something like that ever happen?"
I made a reference to Margaret Mead and said:
"Among the people, the males and females develop a special bond with each other, and if they are much older than you, much, much older than you, and a very special feeling, then they can also be naked together."
"Mama, have you done this before?"
"Yes", I said.
"But, Mama, you can't have any children."
She knows that I adopted her and that I can't have any biological children.
"Yes", I said.
"You don't need to do that again."
I answered "..."
How does that work when men and women are together?
DG: Where do they know that it's the right time?
"Is now the time to take off my pants?" And I answered: "Yes."
"That's completely right.
"That's how it is."
On the way home, she looked out the window and asked: "Mama, if two people just happen to see each other on the street, I mean a man and a woman, and they just do it? Can that happen?"
And I said, "Oh, no. People are so discreet."
"Oh no."
But how would it be on a party? If there were many young people and girls and boys. And if there were many men and women and they just start doing that, Mama?
"Could that happen?"
"Oh no, no", I said.
"So etwas machen wir Menschen nicht." = "We don't do that to people."
When we got home, she saw our cat, and asked: "Mama, how do cats do it?"
And I said, "Oh, basically the same."
But what happens to the legs, Mama?
I don't understand how this works with the legs.
"Can't everyone do a bit of a job, Mama?"
"By the way, the legs..., but the legs..., but the legs..."
"So let's think about how we manage our money."
But I don't understand that.
We know what? Why don't we just look into the internet? Maybe we can see there...
Unfortunately, there are many videos with cats in a pair.
We looked at each other, and I was grateful because she only said "Wow! That's crazy."
And what are the dogs doing?
We also gave out dog treats, and they looked at us, and they were totally enthralled.
Finally, she says, "Mama, do you think there are people on the Internet who are getting married?"
Oh, no. I looked into her trusting eyes and said, "Oh, no. = Oh, no.
"Something like that would never happen."
Thank you very much.
Thank you very much.
It was a pleasure to be here. Thank you.
Last year I asked you to give me your data, to put your data online, in the assumption that if people put their data online, government data, scientific data, community data, whatever, they would be used by other people in a way that they never could have imagined.
I'm back here today, to show you a few examples, really to show you that there's a free data movement, now, everywhere in the world.
The call for "Ride now!"
I called people in the audience everywhere in the world.
Let's watch the video.
"Oh, I just got some raw data. Here are the ones that are about bicycle accidents."
Times Online needed two days to create a map, a mixed map -- we call these things mixed -- a mixed user interface with which you can access and find out if your own route to work is affected.
Here are more data, data from traffic surveys, again, from the British government, and because they used the Linked Data Standards, a user could just create a map, just by clicking on it.
Change these data? Well, let's go back to 2008.
Look at Zanesville, Ohio.
This is a map of an attorney. On this map he has marked water power plants and which houses are there, and he has shown which houses have a water connection.
And from other sources he got information that shows which of the houses are inhabited by white people.
Well, the correlation was just too big, he thought, between houses that were inhabited by white people and houses that had water and the judge was not exactly pleased.
The judge was not impressed with the sum of 10,9 million dollars.
This is the power of data, you take a lot of data, combine it with other data and results will pop up.
Let's look at some data from Great Britain.
These are British government data, a completely independent site, "Where does my money go".
Everyone is allowed to visit and investigate them.
You can search for specific types of consumption or you can look at the different regions and compare them.
This also happens in the UK with British government data.
Yes, of course you can do it here.
Here is a page that allows you to view funding in California.
(Applause) Peter Diamandis: So, for example, Long Beach, California, can look at how much money they have spent on things like energy. = (Applause) Peter Diamandis: So, for example, Long Beach, California, can look at how much money they have spent on things like energy.
In reality, this is the graph of the number of datasets in the databases of data.gov and data.gov.uk.
And I'm so happy to see a big race between Great Britain in blue and the United States in red.
How can you use such things?
For example, if you have a lot of information about places, you can make a map from a zip code -- which is like a postcode plus four -- you can make a map for a specific group of houses, a map that contains very, very specific information about things like bus stops, things that are very specific to your area.
If you expand this a bit, this is a mash-up of the data that was published about the Afghan elections.
You can apply your own criteria, depending on what you want to see.
The red circles are voting booths, selected according to your criteria.
And then you can also select other things on the map to see which other factors there are - like the danger level.
This was also government information.
I've also talked about community-generated data -- I've even edited some of them.
This is the Wiki map, this is the Open Street map.
"Terrace Theater"? I actually put this on the map because it wasn't on the map for TED last year.
I wasn't the only person who edited the Open Street Map.
Every blip on this visualization -- assembled by ITO World -- shows a processing in 2009, made on the Open Street Map.
Let's now turn the world in the same year.
Everyone has a moment of processing. Someone somewhere who looks at the Open Street Map and notices that it could be better.
Europe is lit up with over-processing.
Some places maybe not as much as they should be.
To focus on Haiti.
The map of Port-au-Prince at the end of 2009 was not as good as it could have been, not as good as the map of California.
Fortunately, just after the earthquake, GeoEye, a commercial company, published satellite images with a license that allowed the open-source community to use them.
This is January in the editing period... that is the earthquake.
Immediately after the earthquake, people all over the world looked at the map, cartographers who wanted to help and could, and they edited the map and built it quickly.
We are now focusing on Port-au-Prince.
The blue are refugee camps, which the volunteers saw from the [satellite] images.
Now we have a real-time map which shows where refugee camps are and it was the best map to use when you were doing relief work in Port au-Prince.
Notice that it is available on this Garmin Positioning device that is used by rescue teams on the scene.
(Laughter) Here is the map on the left side, which shows a hospital -- in reality, it's a hospital ship.
This is a real-time map showing blocked roads, damaged buildings and refugee camps. It shows things that are needed for rescue and emergency work.
(Applause) DL: Oh yeah, okay, in my family we had seven girls, four boys, we had two fiddles and one piano, and of course we were all fighting to play on the instruments, so dad and mom set a rule that you couldn't kick anyone off the instrument. You had to wait until they were finished, so of course, what we would do is
I have just started to use the data that you have provided. I would like to thank you for that.
Close your eyes and stretch your hands out.
Now, think about what you could hold in your hands: an apple, or maybe a wallet.
And now open your eyes.
How about a life?
What you see here is a newborn baby.
It looks like it's sleeping peacefully. In fact, it's fighting for its life because it can't regulate its own body temperature.
This baby is so tiny that it doesn't have enough fat to keep its body warm.
Unfortunately, every year 20 million such babies are born.
4 million of them die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die die
But the problem is that those who survive will grow up with serious chronic health problems.
That's because a baby in the first month is only focused on growing.
But if it has to fight against under-cooling, its organs cannot develop normally, which leads to a series of health problems, starting with diabetes and heart disease and ending with a low IQ.
And many of these problems could have been avoided if these babies had been kept warm enough.
That's the main task of an incubator.
Normal incubators need electricity and cost up to 20.000 dollars.
[Unclear] will be found in rural areas of developing countries.
Because of this, parents try to solve the problem by binding the baby to a warm bottle or placing it under a lamp, as you can see here - all methods that are as ineffective as they are unsafe.
Something like this I've seen with my own eyes.
I met this young woman on my first trip to India. She was called Sevitha and had just given birth to a baby girl.
She took her baby to the next village hospital, and the doctor there told her to take her to the hospital in the city, where they could put her in an incubator.
This hospital was 4 hours away, and Sevitha had no money to get there. So her baby died.
In light of these and many other similar stories, my team and I realized that we needed a local solution, something that could work without electricity and be enough to feed a mother or a nurse, since most births still take place at home.
We needed something that was transportable, that could be sterilized and reused for many babies, something that had to be cheap compared to the 20,000 dollars that an incubator in the USA cost.
What came out of this was that this is what happened.
What you see here, doesn't look like a breeding ground at all.
It looks more like a little baby's sleep sack.
"You can open it completely, and it's waterproof."
There are no boundaries, so he can easily sterilize himself.
His secret is this wax paper.
It consists of a heat-storage material.
a substance that melts at a body temperature of 37 degrees Celsius.
You can also heat it up with hot water and keep it at a constant temperature for 4 to 6 hours. After that, you just heat it up again.
Then you put it back in this little pocket here, where it makes a warm microclimate for the baby.
It looks good, but we've tested it out a dozen times in the field and talked to doctors, mothers and the hospital staff to make sure that this really does meet the needs of the local population.
We are planning to bring this invention to the market in India in 2010. We are aiming for a price of 25 dollars, which is less than 0.1 percent of what a normal incubator costs.
And so we hope to save nearly a million babies within the next 5 years.
This will eventually lead to a reduction in the population growth.
It seems paradox, but it has turned out that with the reduction of child mortality, the population size also goes back, because the parents no longer have to expect that their babies will die.
We hope that the "Embrace" baby warmer and other similar, simple, easy-to-use, affordable solutions represent a new trend in future technologies: simple, local, affordable solutions that can bring about huge social changes.
We've been guided by certain important principles.
We really tried to understand the end consumer, in our case people like Sevitha.
We are trying to understand the root of the problem, and not so much to be influenced by what is already there.
I am convinced, that this problem can be solved in the simplest way.
that we can make new technologies accessible to the broad masses of the population
and by the simple warmth of "Embrace" millions of lives can be saved.
We have public officials who are out of control. They write laws that are incomprehensible. And these laws are written in such a way that they cover about 40,000 pages of text with individual provisions. This complexity has a very negative effect on our lives.
When you come back from Iraq or Vietnam, you have to deal with a mountain of paper to get your social security benefits. If you want to get a small business loan, you'll be confronted with a mountain of paper.
What can we do about it? For me, simplicity is a way to achieve more clarity, more transparency, more empathy and more humanity in communication.
I have been doing this for 30 years.
I'm from the advertising and design industry.
My main goal is to understand people and how they interact with the public, how they interact with companies, how they decide what they want to do with their business, and how they decide what products they want to buy.
Short and sweet, as President Obama said: "I don't understand why there isn't a customer credit agreement that is only one page long and written in simple English",
I have locked myself in my room, I have set the content, I have designed the document, and I have written it in simple English.
I then checked with the two best credit card lawyers in the state.
That was a good thing.
NA: Then I went one step further and asked myself: "Why do we have to hold on to the difficult lawyers and only take paper documents? Let's go online."
Some people will probably need help at the computer.
If you're paying 62 dollars for a meal with a credit card, the longer you spend, the more you'll pay back in interest, and the more you'll pay in the end.
(Video) Noa: Do you think your bank will show this to someone?
But it will work. It is more effective than just the help at the computer.
How about "over the limit"?
Maybe hidden costs.
That has to be defined and explained to people.
If you translate it into plain English, the institute is forced to offer the customer a way out, a payment delay, instead of taking a risk.
Simple English means to change the content.
An example, I'm proud of, is this agreement with IBM.
It's a raster, a calendar.
To one date, IBM goes, to the other you have to sign a contract.
That came in very well at the business world.
And I can tell you about a good news today:
Every tenth taxpayer receives a notice from the IRS, the tax authority.
This means that 200 million letters are sent.
When I saw one of these typical letters, I let it run through my simplification lab. It was completely incomprehensible.
All the circled
We have reviewed more than 1000 letters and have edited 70% of the IRS communication in simple English.
They were all tested before.
If I send it through my lab, this map shows that now everything is understandable.
And the IRS has introduced the program at its own.
At the moment there are a number of things that I want to draw your attention to.
At the moment there is a lot of discussion about a customer protection agency and how to simplify things.
We all see this complexity.
This is our task and the task of this organisation, to make clear, transparent and to be empathetic to a national priority.
We should not allow the public to communicate in such a way as they communicate.
Never do business with companies that offer hidden commissions.
How do we want to change the world?
By clarifying, making transparent and simplifying the national task.
Thank you.
(Applause) Today I'm going to talk to you about energy and climate.
Maybe this surprises you, because my full-time occupation is with the foundation, and it's mostly about vaccines and seeds, to help the poorest 2 billion people in the world have a better life.
Energy and climate are extremely important for these people, in fact even more important than for everyone else on the planet.
Climate change means that their crops will not grow for many years. It is too much or too little rain. Things will change so that they can't handle their fragile environment.
This leads to starvation. It leads to insecurity. It leads to riots.
will a climate change be terrible for them.
Also, the energy cost is very important.
It's a fact that if you could only reduce the price of one thing, energy would be the most effective way to reduce poverty.
The energy price is fallen over time.
The progress society is based on energy progress.
The coal revolution drove the industrial revolution and even in the 20th century there was a rapid fall in electricity prices and so we can make modern materials and so many things.
We are in a wonderful situation with electricity in the rich world.
But if we reduce the price -- let's halve the price -- we hit a new barrier and this barrier is linked to CO2.
CO2 warmt den Planeten und die Gleichung für CO2 ist eigentlich ziemlich klar.
The CO2 emissions that result in the temperature rise also have some very negative consequences. Effects on the weather and perhaps even worse, the indirect consequence that the natural ecosystems cannot adapt to such rapid changes and therefore entire ecosystems collapse.
Now, the exact relationship between a rise in CO2 and the resulting temperature change and where its further consequences lie, there are some uncertainties, but not many.
There is no doubt that the consequences will be extremely bad.
Do we really have to go down to near zero?
"Is not half or a quarter enough?"
The answer is: Until we get close to zero, the temperature will continue to rise.
That's why it's a big challenge.
It is quite different to say that we have a 3.5 m high truck that has to drive under a 3 m bridge. You can then drive it under the bridge.
This must be down to zero.
We are releasing 26 billion tons of carbon dioxide every year.
Every American about 20 tons. People from poor countries, less than one.
On average, it's about 5 tons for each person on the planet.
And somehow we have to bring about changes that will reduce the number to zero.
It has been rising steadily.
Only different economic changes have had any influence on it and we have to go from rapid growth to reduction and to zero.
A little multiplication. You want to bring this thing to zero and it's going to be dependent on the number of people, the services that everybody uses, the average energy per service and the CO2 that's emitted per unit of energy.
Let's look at each factor individually and think about how we can get this to zero.
Probably one of these numbers must be very close to zero.
Now, this is basic algebra, but let's go through it.
First we have the population.
Today there are 6,8 billion people.
and it's moving to 9 billion.
If we are very successful with new vaccines, health care and reproductive medicine, we could reduce it by 10% to 15%, but at the moment we see a rise of 1.3%.
The second factor is the services we use.
Everything that we eat, wear, watch, heat.
You know, like even, I mean I love like the name, the -- TED.
It's great that this number is rising.
In the rich world, in the upper billion, we could perhaps make cuts and use less, but in the average, this number will increase every year and will therefore double overall, the number of services that will be provided per person.
There is light at home, so that one can read the homework.
These students don't have it, so they go out and read their homework under the streetlight.
Well, with efficiency, the E, the energy per service, there are finally good news.
We have something that doesn't rise.
Some services can be reduced by 90%.
Some services can be reduced by 90%.
In other services, like the production of fertilizers, 105 00:05:58,000 --&gt; 00:06:02,000 or aviation or aviation, the scope for improvement is very much smaller.
In general, if we are optimistic, we may get a reduction by a factor 3 or even a factor 6.
PR: But with the first three factors, we have gone from 26 billion to maybe 13 billion tons. And that is not enough!
So the fourth factor will be the amount of CO2 emitted per energy unit.
The question is whether you can get it on zero.
If you burn coal: No.
If you burn gas: No.
Every manufacturing process nowadays emits CO2, except for renewable energy and nuclear energy.
What we have to do on a global level is to create a new system.
We need energy wonders.
If I use the term "miracle" I don't mean the impossible.
The microprocessor is a wonder. The PC is a wonder.
The Internet and its services are a miracle.
People here have contributed a lot to the development of many of these wonders.
Normally there is no deadline that one needs a miracle until a certain date.
Normally, you stand next to it and some come, others don't.
We must give full gas and get a miracle in a very short time.
I wondered how I could really bring this across.
Is there a natural illustration, a demonstration that the idea of people here is created?
"I remember last year when I brought mosquitoes and people liked it."
The idea really hit home for them, you know, that there are people who live with mosquitoes.
For energy, I found this one.
I decided that the release of glutton worms would be my this year's contribution to the environment.
Here are some natural ant-hills.
They told me that they don’t bite. In fact, they probably won’t even leave the glass.
There are all kinds of game solutions like this, but they all don't bring much.
We need solutions, either one or several that have an unimaginable scalability and unrivaled reliability. And although there are many directions in which people are looking for solutions, I really see only five that can meet these big requirements.
I have left out geothermal, fusion and biofuel.
These people may be doing a moderate job and if they do better than I expect, that would be great, but my core point here is that we need to work on all of them, and we can't give up on any of them because they are intimidating us, because all of them have significant problems.
Let's first look at the burning of fossil fuels, combustion of either coal or natural gas.
"How can you invest in Africa when there's corruption?"
There are some pilot projects that can achieve a 60% - 80% level, but it will be very difficult to achieve a 100% level. And achieving an agreement on the storage of CO2 is a big challenge.
Who's gonna make sure?
Who can guarantee that something that is literally billions of times larger than any kind of trash that you can imagine is not going to happen?
A lot of volumes.
That's a hard nut.
Nuclear energy.
The three big problems are the cost, especially in regulated countries. The question of safety, that you really feel that nothing can go wrong, despite the human contribution, that the fuel is not used for weapons.
And what do you do with the trash?
Although he is not very big, there are many concerns.
Three very difficult problems, which may be solved.
Three very difficult problems that might be solvable, and that's why we should work on them.
The last three of the five I've summarized.
Renewable energies, as they are often called.
They have some disadvantages.
The energy density of these technologies is dramatically lower than that of power plants.
These are energy farms, you talk about square kilometers, a thousand times more area than a normal power plant.
These sources are subject to interruption:
The sun doesn't shine all day, it doesn't shine every day and the wind doesn't blow constantly.
That's why you need to have a way to get the energy even when you're not available.
There are big challenges here. There are challenges in the transmission. If we say, for example, that the energy source is outside the country, you don't just need the technology, you have to deal with the risk that the energy comes from somewhere else.
There is the storage problem.
All the batteries that we produce now could store less than 10 minutes of the total energy that the world uses.
We need a big breakthrough here, something that will be 100 times better than the approaches at the moment.
It's not impossible, but it's not easy.
That happens when you try to bring the interrupted sources to say we are talking about 20% - 30% of the consumption.
If you want to be 100% sure, you need an incredible battery.
Where should we go?
A "Manhattan Project"? How do we get to the target?
We need many companies that work on it. Hundreds.
We need at least 100 people in each of these five areas.
You will say that they are crazy! That's good.
I think there are many people who are already engaged there.
Bill Gross has several companies, including one called eSolar that has great solar thermal technologies.
Vinod Khosla invests in dozens of companies that make great things and have interesting opportunities and I try to support that.
Nathan Myhrvold and I are funding a company that, perhaps surprisingly, follows the nuclear approach.
There are some innovations in the nuclear field; modular, liquid.
The development in this industry has stopped a while ago, so it is not a big surprise that some good concepts are lying around.
(Applause) The TerraPower concept means that instead of burning one percent of uranium, which is uranium 235, we decided to burn the 99% of uranium 238.
That's a pretty crazy idea.
But in fact, people have been thinking about this for a long time, but you can never simulate it properly, but since we have modern supercomputers, you can simulate it and see that: Yes! With the right approach, it looks like it would work.
And because you burn 99% of it, the cost profile is very much better.
In fact, they burn the rubbish, and you can even use the waste from today's reactors as fuel.
Instead of getting all worked up about it, just burn it. A great thing.
The uranium is gradually being used up, a bit like a candle.
You see, it's kind of a core, often referred to as a "wandering wave reactor".
It really solves the fuel problem.
Here is a picture of a place in Kentucky.
(Laughter) Okay, so this is the waste that is burned today.
The U.S. has been trying to get rid of it for hundreds of years.
And if you filter ocean water cheaply and simply, you get enough fuel for the rest of the planet's life.
Do you know there are still many challenges, but it is an example of many hundreds of concepts that we need to move forward.
Let us consider how we should measure our success.
What should our testimony look like?
Let's go to the goal that we need to reach and then we'll talk about the step in between.
Many people speak of an 80% reduction by 2050.
It is really very important that we get there.
The rest of the 20% will be produced in poor countries, and still some agriculture. Hopefully, wood burning and cement will be clean by then.
To reach this 80% target, the industrial countries, including countries like China, must completely change their electricity generation.
The other note says whether we're going to use the zero emission technology in all developed countries and we're on the way to getting it.
That is super important.
This will be a key element of this evidence.
If we go back from there, what will the 2020 report look like?
It should contain the two elements again.
We should use the efficiency measures to bring down emissions. The less we emit, the less the CO2-sum will be and thus the temperature.
But this note is for the things we do, which do not completely reduce to the great reductions, only equal, or even less important than the other, which represents the speed of innovation for these breakthroughs.
These breakthroughs must be pursued with full-speed and we can measure them: in company numbers, in pilot projects and regulatory changes.
There are many great books on this topic.
The Al Gore book "We have the choice" and David McKay's "Sustainable Energy Without the Hot Air."
They really go for it and create a framework where this can be discussed because we need support from all sides.
There is a lot that has to come together.
This is a wish.
A very specific wish that we invent this technology.
If you would only allow me to choose the next 50 years, I could choose the president, I could choose the vaccine, and I love that, or I could choose this one, which is that half-price energy without CO2 will be invented. I would choose that one.
This has the biggest impact.
If we don't get this wish, the gap between long-term and short-term thinking people will become a terrible chasm, between the USA and China, between poor and rich countries, and almost all lives of these 2 billion people will be much worse.
So müssen wir also tun?
For which measures do I appeal?
We need to get more research funding.
If countries meet in places like Koppenhagen, they should not only talk about CO2.
You should discuss this strategy and you would be shocked by the ridiculously low amounts of money that are spent on these innovative approaches.
We need to have some sort of price signal, carbon taxes, cap &amp; trade, something that creates a price signal.
We must spread the message.
We have to have a dialogue that is rational and complete and also the things that are done by the government.
It's a very important wish, but I think we can fulfill it.
Thank you very much.
Thank you very much.
Thank you.
First of all, can you give us an idea of the size of this investment?
To run the simulation on a supercomputer, we only need a few million. And even if we tested our materials in a Russian reactor, to make sure it works properly, you only need a few hundred million.
The difficult step is to build the first reactor, to find more billions to build the regulations and the place where the first one is actually built.
Once the first one is done, when it runs as promised, then it's all clear, because the economics, the energy density is so different than nuclear energy, as we know it.
To understand this correctly: This means to build deep into the ground like a vertical pillar of nuclear fuel, this used uranium and then the process begins above and works its way down?
Exactly. Today you have to refill the reactor every day, so there are many people and many inspections that can go wrong. This thing where you open it and stuff in or stuff out. That's not good!
But if you have very cheap fuel, you can fill it up for 60 years -- think of a pillar -- without the complications.
And it sits there and burns for 60 years and then it's done.
A nuclear reactor that even offers a solution for the garbage.
Yes. Well, what happens to the trash: You can just leave it -- there's less trash with this method -- then you take it and you put it in the next reactor and you burn it.
And we start by taking the trash that already exists, which is in these cooling tanks or dryers in the reactors. That's our starting fuel.
That which was a problem for these reactors, is what we are filling with and that will dramatically reduce the volume of waste.
(Applause) But while I've been talking to different people in this world about these possibilities,
where is the greatest interest in actually doing something like this?
Now we haven't yet decided on a place and there are a lot of interesting disclosure rules for everything nuclear in the name of. There is a lot of interest and the people of the company were in Russia, India, China... I was here and I talked to the energy minister about how this fits into the energy agenda.
I am optimistic. Do you know that the French and the Japanese have done something in the direction of the problem?
This is a variant of a thing that was made.
That's a big step forward, but it's like a fast reactor and some countries have built them, so everyone who has built a fast reactor is a candidate for our first.
In my vision: Time frame and probability of something like that actually happening?
Now we need one of these scalable, power generating things, we've had 20 years to invent and then 20 years to implement.
That is the deadline that has shown us the environmental models that we have to comply with.
And, you know, TerraPower, if everything goes well, and that's a big wish, could hold that easily.
There are dozens of companies today, and we need hundreds who can provide the funding for their pilots.
It would be best if they could do several things, because then one could use a mixture.
At least we need a solution.
Regarding the big possible breakthroughs, is this the biggest you know?
An energy breakthrough is the most important thing.
That would have been it without the environmental challenge, but the challenge makes it so much more important.
Nuclear sector has other innovative firms.
We don't know their work as well as this, but there is the modular method, which is another approach.
There is a liquid reaction type which seems to be difficult, but perhaps they are telling us about it.
And so there are different, but the beautiful thing about it is that a uranium molecule has a million times as much energy as a, say, a carbon molecule and therefore, if you can deal with the problems and they are mainly the radiation, the foot pressure and the costs, the potential, so the effects on the land and other things, is almost in its own league.
If that doesn't work, what then?
Do we have to take emergency measures to try to keep the earth's temperature stable?
When you get into this situation, it is as if you have eaten too much, and you are about to have a heart attack. What do you do? You may need an operation on your heart or something like that.
There is a research direction called geoengineering that deals with different techniques to slow down the warming, so that we would have 20 or 30 years to get together.
That is only a guarantee method.
We hope we don't need this.
Some people say you shouldn't work at all because it might make you fat, so you eat more because you know you'll be saved by the heart operation.
I don't know if that's a good idea if you think about the importance of this problem, but there's a debate about geoengineering now, whether we should have it available if things come faster than we expect.
Do you have a few sentences to convince you?
Unfortunately, the skeptics live in very different camps.
Those who make scientific arguments are very few.
Do they say that there are negative effects that are related to the clouds that are moving things?
There are very few things they can say that have a chance in a million.
The main problem here is similar to AIDS.
We make the mistake now, and pay for it later.
So the idea is that you invest in something that you don't have yet, and then you don't know what you're going to get. In fact, the IPCC report is not the worst-case scenario, and there are people in the rich world who look at the IPCC report and say, okay, that's not a big deal.
The fact is that this uncertainty should worry us.
"Okay, I don't care if it emits CO2, I wish it would, but I'll probably accept it because it's cheaper than the previous method."
And that would be your answer to the Björn Lomborg argument that if you spend all this time and energy on solving the CO2 problem, you're going to be hurting other things that you could be doing, like reducing poverty, combating malaria, and so on, that it's a waste of resources to spend money on that, while there are better things you can be doing.
Well, the actual expenditures for research -- let's say the U.S. should spend 10 billion more than they do now -- that's not so dramatic.
Under which other things should not suffer.
So my argument today is basically this.
Unless you are very close to the end of your budget and only fund the learning curve. I think we should try more things that have the potential to be very cheap.
If the test you get is a very high energy price, only the rich can afford it.
I mean, each of us here could spend five times as much energy on our lifestyle without changing our lifestyle.
For the lower two billion it's a disaster.
And even Lomborg thinks about it.
Why is research not discussed anymore?
He is still associated with the skeptic camp, but he has understood that this is a very lonely group and he is bringing the research argument.
And that's a thought I think is appropriate.
Research, it's just crazy how little it's supported.
I think I speak for almost everyone here when I say I really hope your wish comes true. Thank you very much.
Thank you.
"Why am I, even though I know what I know, not a vegetarian?"
Finally, I am one of the eco-types. I grew up with hippie parents in a blockhouse and have always been a hippie.
a website set up called "Treehugger" (= tree hugger). I take these things seriously.
I knew that a Hamburg resident could increase my risk of dying by a third by each day.
I knew the cruelty that the 10 billion animals that we raise each year for meat production are raised under industrial conditions that we would never consider for our own cats, dogs and other pets.
Meat causes more emissions than the whole traffic together: cars, trains, planes, buses, boats, everything.
The beef production needs 100 times more water than most vegetables.
I knew that I wasn't alone.
We eat twice as much meat as in the 50s.
What used to be a special little pleasure is now the rule and very much the norm.
All of these aspects should have been enough to make vegetarians.
And yet I couldn't help myself - ts, ts, ts - and I took a good old steak in.
Why did I hesitate? I recognized it,
that what I was sold was a binary solution.
Either you are a meat eater, or you are a vegetarian. And I guess I was just not ready yet.
Imagine your last Hamburg.
My good sense, my good intentions stood in conflict with my taste buds.
And I would like to do it later. And little about it was surprising later.
Sounds familiar?
I wondered: Could there be a third solution?
And I thought about it. And I had an idea.
And I have been practicing it for a whole year and it is great.
It's called: Vegetarian on Mondays.
The name says it all. Nothing with a face from Monday to Friday.
The weekend is coming.
Easy.
If you want to go one step further, you should consider that the main culprits in terms of environmental damage and health are red and processed meat.
Should replace it with some good, sustainable fish.
This is structured and therefore it is easy to recognize. And it is okay to not be too strict here and there.
In the end, it means that five days a week, he will be eating 70 percent less meat.
The daily vegetarian program is great.
TS: My CO2 footprint is smaller, I reduce the environmental pollution. I feel better towards the animals. I even save money.
And best of all - I'm healthier, I know I'll live longer, and I've even lost a little weight.
Please ask yourself, for your health, for the environment, for the animals, what do you think about giving the workday vegetarianism a chance?
If we all ate half as much meat, it would be as if half of us were vegetarians.
Thank you.
There are many web 2.0 consultants who make a lot of money.
They earn their living
I will try to save you all the time and all the money and explain it to you in the next three minutes, so please be patient.
In 2005 I created a website with a few friends, called Reddit.com.
Something like that, what you'd call a news website for society.
In the end, the democratic start page is the best thing about the internet. You find interesting stuff, like a TED talk, and then you post it on Reddit, and then the members of your age group either like it or don't.
And so the start page is born. It goes up, it goes down, it goes up, it goes down, it goes up, it goes down, it goes up, it goes down, it goes up, it goes down, it goes up, it goes down, it goes up, it goes down, it goes up, it goes down, it goes up, it goes down,
And every day, half a million people visit the site. But this isn't Reddit.
It's about discovering new things that appear on the Internet.
I've seen all the memes that could have been created in the past four years, all the trends that have appeared on our website.
But as I said, this is not about Reddit.
Actually, it's about whales.
In fact, it's about Greenpeace, an environmental organisation, which wanted to stop the Japanese government's seal hunt.
These whales were killed.
And Greenpeace wanted to prevent this. And a method to do this was to plant a GPS chip in one of these whales.
To be able to personify his movements, one wanted to give him a name.
Also, after the true Internet-manner, they put together a ballot that included a whole bunch of very learned, very well-educated, cultured names.
I think this is a word in Farsi for "immortal".
This here, I think, means in one of the Polynesian languages "the divine power of the ocean".
Ace of hearts.
Unusual. Mister Pants, or Splashy, as he was known to his friends, was very popular on the internet.
Someone on Reddit thought, "Man, that sounds great. We should all vote for that."
And people on Reddit actually jumped on that and everyone was on board.
Also begann die Abstimmung und wir klemmten uns voll dahinter.
We even changed our logo temporarily to support the project.
It didn't take long for the other websites to say, "Yeah, we love Splashy Pants."
The percentage of votes started from 5% at the start of the match to 70% at the end of the match.
Very impressive, isn't it? We won! Mister Splashy Pants was elected. Hmm, a joke.
Greenpeace was not so happy about this, because they wanted one of their more serious names to win.
"No, no, it was just for fun. We are extending the vote by one week."
We were naturally a bit angry.
They called the action "Fightin' Splashy".
And really the whole Reddit community and pretty much the whole rest of the internet was behind us.
Facebook groups were created. Facebook applications were created.
The slogan was "Let your conscience decide! Decide for Mister Splashy Pants!"
And people put up signs in the real world (Laughter) - all because of this wall.
And when we put it together, it brought the final decision.
To give you an idea of the overwhelming victory, only 3 percent of the voters ranked it as their second choice.
Here was a clear lesson given:
And the guy said that the Internet loves Mister Splashy Pants.
It is a great name.
(Laughter) Everyone will say, "Mr. Splashy Pants."
And that's what made the whole thing work.
The post-game for Greenpeace was that they developed a whole marketing campaign around the thing.
They sell Mister-Splashy-Pants-Hemden and -Anstecknadeln.
They even gave out an e-card so that you could send your friend a dancing splashy.
More important than that, they actually fulfilled their mission: the Japanese government stopped its whaling expedition. Mission accomplished.
Greenpeace was thrilled. The whales were happy. A quote.
(Laughter) However, the Redditors in the Internet community really enjoyed the action, but they were not real Wal-lovers.
Some of them, for sure. But we're mostly talking about people who are really interested and fascinated by this great meme. And then, actually, one of Greenpeace came on our website and thanked Reddit for its help.
"And I thought Palm Harbor Village was over there."
That's how the Internet works.
The whole big secret is that the Internet creates equal competition conditions.
Your link is as good as mine, and yours is as good as mine. If you have a browser, anyone can go to any website, no matter how big their budget is.
As long as you keep the neutrality of the net.
The other important point is that it's now free to upload content.
There are so many excellent publishing tools available today that it only takes a few minutes to produce something really good.
And the running costs are so low that you should give it a try.
And if you do that, then they should be honest! Be honest! Be free!
One of the great lessons that Greenpeace really learned was that it's okay to lose control.
It's okay to take yourself a little less seriously, given the fact that you could ultimately achieve your goal.
The last message I want to tell you is that you can be very successful online.
But the message can not come from above.
JE: If you want to succeed, you have to be willing to give up the reins.
Thank you very much.
A few years ago, here at TED, Peter Skillman held a design competition called "The Marshmallow Challenge."
The idea is pretty simple. Four-person teams must build the largest free-standing structure with 20 spaghetti, about 1m of string, 1m of tape and a marshmallow.
The marshmallow must be on top.
And, although it really seems like it's easy, it's actually really hard, because it's people who are very eager to work together very quickly.
And so, I thought this was an interesting idea and I've turned it into a design workshop.
It was a huge success.
Since then I've done about 70 workshops around the world, with students, developers and architects, even with CTOs of Fortune-50 companies and there's something about this task that allows deep impressions into the nature of collaboration and I'd like to share some of them with you.
Most people start by orienting themselves.
They talk about it, they think about it, they argue about power, they argue about power.
then you invest a little time in planning and organization. You sketch and lay out spaghetti.
You invest a large portion of your time in the construction of constantly growing structures.
And finally, just before they have no more time, someone takes the marshmallow and they put it carefully on the top, step back and "Ta-da"! they admire their work.
But then, almost always, what happens is that the "ta-da" becomes an "uh-oh" because the weight of the marshmallow causes the whole thing to wobble and then it collapses.
(There are a lot of people who have more "uh-oh" moments than others, and among the worst are fresh graduates.
You are lying, you are cheating, you are confused and you are producing really poor products.
And of course there are teams that have more "ta-da" things and are the best in the kindergarten.
And that's pretty amazing.
They don't just make the highest towers, but also the most interesting structures of all.
What they might ask is: How did that happen? Why? What about them?
Peter tells us that none of the children invest time in being the CEO of the Spaghetti Company.
They don't invest any time in power struggles.
But there is another reason.
And that the BWL students were trained to find a proper plan, ok!
And then to realize it.
What happens when they put the marshmallow on the tip of their tongue, they don't have time and what happens?
It's a crisis.
Sounds familiar, doesn't it?
What kindergarteners do is they start with the marshmallow and they build prototypes, successful prototypes, always with the marshmallow at the top, so that they have the opportunity to repair failed prototypes.
Constructors recognize this kind of collaboration as the core of an iterative process.
With every attempt, the children get immediate feedback what worked and what didn't.
The performance with prototypes is much better -- but let's see how different teams act.
The average for most is about 50cm, BWL students do half of that, lawyers do a little more, but not much, kindergarten kids are better than the adults.
Who is the most successful?
Architects and engineers, fortunately.
1m is the highest I've ever seen.
Because they understand triangles and self-strengthening geometric patterns are the key to building stable structures.
CEOs liegen etwas über Durchschnitt. But here it gets interesting.
If you put an executive administrator on the team, they will be significantly better.
"This team will win."
You can predict that. Why does that happen?
Because they have special abilities of process management.
You lead the process, you understand it.
That team that is responsible and takes care of the work of the team will significantly improve the performance of the team.
Specialized skills and process skills lead to success.
If you have 10 teams that typically act, you get about 6, who have stable structures.
I tried something exciting.
I thought we'd bring the pokereinsatz right away.
I paid a $10,000 prize for the winner.
What do you think happened to these design students?
What was the result?
This happened. Not one team had a stable structure.
If someone had built a 2.5cm high structure, he would have carried the price home.
Is it not interesting that high bets have a strong effect?
We repeated this exercise with the same students.
What do you think happened next?
Now you understand the advantage of prototyping.
The same, bad team of the same.
They produced the highest construction in the smallest amount of time.
There are deep lessons for us in the nature of drive and success.
Why would someone actually invest time to create a marshmallow challenge?
The reason is, I help create digital tools and processes to help teams, cars, video games and "visual effects" create.
And what the Marshmallow Challenge does is it helps them identify hidden assumptions.
For the sake of honesty, every project has its own marshmallow.
The challenge offers a common experience, a common language or attitude, the right prototype to build.
And this is the value of this simple exercise, this simple practice.
And those of you who are interested can visit marshmallowchallenge.com.
It is a blog where you see how to build the marshmallows.
There is a step-by-step guide there.
You find crazy examples from all over the world, how people optimize and refine the system.
There are also world records.
And the basic lesson I think is that construction is actually a bonding sport.
(Applause) So you're talking to people in the fashion industry and they're like, "Shhh!
And sometimes a small prototype of this experience is all that is needed to get us from "uh-oh" to "ta-da".
And that can make a big difference.
Thank you.
When Steve Lopez, columnist for the Los Angeles Times, went out on the streets of the center of Los Angeles, he heard a wonderful music.
She came from a man, an African-American, sympathetic, rough, homeless, who played a guitar with only two strings.
Many of you will know the story, because from Steve's article it was later made into a book, which was then made into a movie, with Robert Downey Jr. as Steve Lopez and Jamie Foxx as Nathaniel Anthony Ayers, the bassist who studied at the Juilliard Conservatory and whose promising career was tragically ended by his paranoid schizophrenia.
Nathaniel left Juilliard, he had a nervous breakdown and 30 years later he was living on the streets of Skid Row in the center of Los Angeles.
Let me recommend to you all to read Steve's book or watch the movie so that you understand not only the wonderful connection that has arisen between these two men, but also how the music helped to create this connection and how it was the instrument that helped Nathaniel to get away from the street.
I met Mr Ayers in 2008, two years ago, in the Walt Disney Concert Hall.
He had just heard a performance of Beethoven's First and Fourth Symphonies and came up to the stage to imagine himself in front of me.
He spoke in a very light and jovial tone about Yo-Yo Ma and Hillary Clinton and how the Dodgers never would get into the Baseball World Series. And all that because of the tuck-tuck passage of the first violin in Beethoven's Fourth Symphony.
We came to talk about music. And a few days later, I got an email saying that Nathaniel was interested in guitar lessons.
I have to mention that Nathaniel refused a medical treatment, because he was already treated with electric shocks and thorazine and handcuffs, a trauma that followed him his whole life.
As a result of this, he is particularly vulnerable to these schizophrenic phases. They are sometimes so bad that they threaten to tear him apart and he disappears for days, wandering the streets of Skid Row, always this horror and the torture of his own mind.
In this state of mind, Nathaniel was when we started our first lesson in the Walt Disney Concert Hall. He had this crazy look in his eyes and seemed completely lost.
He spoke of invisible demons and smoke and how someone wanted to poison him in his sleep.
I was afraid that I might lose him, that he might sink into one of his states and that I might destroy his relationship to the guitar if I started talking about chords and arpeggios and other exciting forms of didactic guitar pedagogy.
I just started playing.
I played the first sentence of Beethoven's Violin Concerto.
While I was playing, I noticed that in Nathaniels eyes a complete change was going on.
It was as if he stood under the influence of an invisible drug, a chemical reaction whose catalyst was my game.
Nathaniels manischer Zorn verwandelte sich in Verständnis, in eine ruhige Neugier und Anmut.
And as if by a miracle, he took his guitar and began to play some excerpts from the violin concertos, and asked me to play them to the end: Mendelssohn, Tschaikowski, Sibelius.
And then we started talking about music, from Bach to Beethoven, Brahms, Bruckner and all the other Bs, from Bartók to Esa-Pekka Salonen.
I realized that he wasn't just a scholar of encyclopedic knowledge about music, but that he was also in a personal relationship with it.
He spoke of her with a passion and a comprehension that I only know from my colleagues in the Philharmonic of Los Angeles.
As he played his music and talked about music, from this paranoid, confused man who had just been running through the streets of Los Angeles, a kind, educated, talented musician had emerged.
Music is medicine. Music changes us.
MS: Music is a form of mental health.
Because music allows him to transform his thoughts and fantasies into something real with his imagination and creativity.
And so he escapes from his tormenting conditions.
I understood that exactly this is the essence of art.
That's why we make music: so that we can create something that's deep inside us, our feelings, through our artistic lens, through our creativity, and make it real.
And the reality of that expression reaches us all, and moves, inspires, and unites us.
What Nathaniel was referring to, the music brought him back to a community of friends.
The inspiring power of music brought him back to a family of musicians who recognized his talent and took care of him.
And I'll always be playing with Nathaniel, no matter where I am, because he reminds me of why I became a musician.
Many thanks.
Thank you. Thank you.
You think the A.U. will put together a conference like this?
I would like to play something that I stole from the cellist.
I hope you forgive me.
Today I'd like to tell you about the human brain that we study at the University of California.
Think for a second about this problem!
There is a lump of meat about 1.4 kg in weight, you can hold in your hand.
But he can think about the size of the interstellar space.
He can think about the importance of infinity, ask questions about the importance of his own existence and think about the nature of God.
And that is truly the most amazing thing in the world.
"It is the greatest mystery to face man: How does it all come about?"
Well, the brain is made up of neurons.
Here we see neurons.
There are 100 billion neurons in the adult human brain.
Every neuron is in contact with about 1.000 to 10.000 other neurons in the brain.
And on that basis, they've calculated that the number of permutations and combinations of brain activity exceeds the number of elements in the universe.
How do you do it, to study the brain?
An introduction is to observe patients with injuries to different parts of the brain and study changes in their behavior.
(Laughter) I talked about that on the last TED.
Today I will talk about a different approach, that is, to implant electrodes in different brain areas and to record the activity of individual neurons in the brain.
This is like the exchange of nerve cells in the brain.
Now, a recent discovery made by researchers in Italy, Parma, by Giacomo Rizzolatti and his colleagues, is a group of neurons, called mirror neurons, that are located in the front part of the brain, in the frontal lobes.
It turns out that there are neurons that are called "motor neurons" in the front part of the brain that we've known about for over 50 years.
(Neuronen) These neurons fire when someone performs a certain action.
If I do that, and I take a bite of an apple, a motor neuron in my brain will fire.
If I swallow and I open a door, another neuron will fire that tells me to open the door.
These are called motor neurons, which you've known for a long time.
What Rizzolatti found was that a subset of these neurons, perhaps about 20 percent of them, also fire when I watch someone else perform the same action.
Here is a neuron that fires when I open my mouth and take something, but it also fires when I observe Joe, as he opens his mouth and takes something.
and that is really surprising,
because it's like this neuron is taking the point of view of the other person.
It's almost as if it's a simulation in virtual reality of the action of the other person.
Now, what is the significance of these mirror neurons?
At least they must be involved in things like imitation and emulation.
Because to imitate a complex act, my brain has to take the perspective of the other person.
This is important for imitation and emulation.
Well, why is that important?
Now let’s look at the next day!
BJ: And how do you imitate? Why is imitation important?
Mirror Neutron and Imitation, Emulation.
Now, let's consider culture, the phenomenon of human culture!
In any case, something very important happened about 75,000 years ago.
So it's a sudden appearance and a rapid spread of a number of skills that are unique to humans, like the use of tools, the use of fire, the use of shelters, and of course, the ability to read the intentions of another person and to interpret the behavior of that person.
All this happened relatively quickly.
Although the human brain has reached its present size already three or four hundred thousand years ago, all that happened very, very fast.
I claim that what happened was the sudden appearance of a highly developed mirror neuron system that allowed it to emulate and imitate other people's actions.
If it came up suddenly, as a result of a random event, for example using fire or a certain kind of tool, it didn't go away but spread quickly through the population or was passed on vertically to the next generation.
Suddenly, Lamarck became Darwinian.
Darwinian evolution is slow; it takes thousands of years.
A bear needs to develop a fur coat, thousands of generations, maybe hundreds of thousands of years.
A human being, a child, can simply watch his father kill another bear, skin it, put the skin on his body, and the fur on his body, and all of a sudden learn. What the bear has spent 100,000 years learning, it can learn in five minutes, perhaps in ten minutes.
And then, once it's learned, it spreads in geometric progression over a population.
The imitation of more complex skills is what we call culture, and the basis of civilization.
There are neurons that are involved in something completely different.
And there are mirror neurons, just as there are mirror neurons for the action, there are mirror neurons for the touch.
In other words, when someone touches me, a neuron in the sensory cortex in the sensory region of the brain fires.
But the same neuron will fire in some cases when I just watch how another person is touched.
It is an empathy.
So that most of them will fire when I touch them at different places. Different neurons for different places.
Aber eine Teilmenge davon wird feuern, wenn ich zusehe, wie jemand anderer an derselben Stelle berührt wird.
We have again here neurons that are involved in the feeling of being touched.
Now the question is: If I just watch how another person is touched, why am I not confused and have literally this feeling of touch from just watching how someone is touched?
That is, I feel with this person, but I don't feel the touch.
Now, that's so, because you have receptors in the skin, touch receptors, and pain receptors that lead to the brain and say: “Don't worry, you won't be touched!”
Feel, always with the other person, but don’t feel the touch, otherwise you will be confused and disoriented.
Well, there's a feedback signal that stops the signal from the spindle neuron, and it keeps you from feeling that touch consciously.
If you take away my arm, just put a bandage on my arm, if you give me an injection in my arm, paralyze the plexus, so that the arm is insensitive, and no feeling comes in my hand, then I feel it literally in my hand.
In other words, we have broken down the barrier between one human being and another.
Gandhi-Neuronen or Empathieneuronen.
And that’s not meant in any metaphorical sense.
Everything that separates you from him, from the other person, is your skin.
Remove the skin, and you feel the touch of that person in your mind.
You have the barrier between you and other human beings removed.
(Beifall) Okay, seriously, there is no real independent self that observes the world, observes other people.
People are actually connected, not just through Facebook and the Internet, but they are actually connected through their neurons.
There are whole chains of neurons that talk to each other.
There is no real distinction between one's own consciousness and that of someone else.
This is not a Hokus-Pokus-Philosophy.
It comes from our understanding of the basic neurology.
If you have a patient with a phantom limb, if the arm was removed and you have a phantom and then you see someone touch you, you feel it in your phantom.
If you have pain in your phantom limb, and you press the hand of the other person, who is massaging your hand, the pain in your phantom hand is reduced, almost as if the neuron in your phantom hand is receiving relief from the mere observation of someone else massaging your hand.
Here is my last day!
For a long time, people have considered natural sciences and the humanities as separate areas.
C. P. Snow spoke of the two cultures: science on the one side, humanities on the other side, never will the two find each other.
I also say that the mirror neuron system is the basis of the interface that allows us to think about things like consciousness, representation of the self, about what separates us from other human beings, what allows us to feel with other human beings, and even things like the origin of culture and civilization, which only humans have developed. Thank you very much!
I've been interested in the placebo effect for a while now. It seems strange that a magician would be interested in it unless you look at it as "a deception that becomes something real if someone believes it hard enough."
In pain management, for example, there is a measurable effect that is called the placebo effect, and that is only because the patient believes that what is happening to them is a pharmacological or a type of...
A deception is turned into something real because someone notices it.
To make ourselves understand each other, I want to show you a very simple, elementary magic trick.
And I will show you how it works. This is a trick that has been in every children's book since the 1950s.
I myself learned it from the Cub Scout Magic of the Boy Scouts in the 1970s.
I will explain it to you and then explain it.
(Laughter) And then I'll explain why I'm explaining him.
Look what happens.
The knife you can examine; my hand you can examine.
I'll just hold the knife like this in my hand.
I'm pulling my sleeves back.
And to make sure nothing disappears or comes out of my sleeve, I will just pull my arm straight here.
That way you can see that nothing moves at any time. As long as I'm pressing down here, nothing can get out of my sleeves or come out.
"And the goal is quite simple."
I will open my hand and hopefully if everything goes well, the knife will be held by my own body magnetism.
It is actually so firmly fixed to its place that I can shake it without the knife falling out.
Nothing goes into my sleeves or comes out, no tricks. And you can check everything.
Ta-da!
Now, that's a trick I often teach little children who are interested in magic, because you can learn a lot about deception when you look more closely, although it's a very simple trick.
I'm sure many of you here in the audience know this trick.
It works like this:
I hold the knife in my hand.
I say that I am wrapping my arm around my waist to make sure that nothing disappears or comes out of my sleeve, and that is a lie.
The reason why I hold my hand is that it contains the real secret of illusion.
In that moment, when I move my hand away from you, so that you can see it from behind, this finger here, my index finger, just moves from there, where it was, to a position, where it is stretched out.
Auch wenn es nicht nur Depression ist, in der es geschlechtsspezifische Unterschiede gibt, sondern auch in so vielen anderen Krankheiten.
And there's someone sitting behind who didn't have a childhood.
He is here. Exactly.
And if I turn around, the finger changes its position.
And now you could talk about why this is a deception, why you don't notice that there are only three fingers here: Because the mind and the way it processes information doesn't count them one by one, but as a group.
But that's not what this is about. And then I open my hand.
Of course it is there, but not by the magnetism of my body, but by a trick, by my finger, which is now there.
And when I close my hand, the same thing happens, by turning my hand, it is hidden that the finger is moving back.
I take this hand away. And here is the knife.
"This trick can be used to introduce your friends and neighbors. Thank you."
Well, (laughter) what does this have to do with the placebo effect?
A year or so ago, I read a study that really shook me up.
I am not a doctor or a researcher, and that was a remarkable thing for me.
So we said, if you give a placebo in the form of a white pill, in the form of a placebo tablet, it's just a round, white pill that has a certain measurable effect.
But if you change the form in which you give the placebo, for example, you change it to a smaller pill and you change the color of it and you print a letter on it, it's actually more effective.
And that, even though none of them have any pharmaceutical ingredients, they are just sugar pills.
But a white pill isn't as good as a blue pill.
What? (Laughter) That really made me flinch.
However, it turned out that this is not all.
If you take capsules, they are even more effective than tablets of any form.
A colored cap that is yellow on one end and red on the other is better than a white cap.
The dosage plays a role as well.
(Laughter) Two pills a day is not as good as three pills - I can't remember the exact statistics, but I'm sorry.
But the most important thing is,...
That the dosages also play a role.
And the form plays a role.
If you want to have the ultimate placebo effect, you have to go to the needle.
Right? A shot of a useless substance, which you inject a patient with.
That creates a very strong image in your head. That's much stronger than a white pill.
This graphic is really... I'll show it to you another time, when we have a projector.
The white pill doesn't work as well as the blue pill, which doesn't work as well as a capsule, which doesn't work as well as a needle.
Nothing about it has any real pharmaceutical effect. It's just our belief in it that produces a stronger effect in us.
I wanted to know if I could use this idea for a magic trick.
I'm taking something that seems to be a deception, and I'm making it look real.
We know from that study that you have to grab the needle when it comes to the matter.
This is a 18 cm long stick. It is very, very sharp. And I will sterilise it first a little bit.
This is really my meat. It is not Damian's special bred meat.
This is my skin. This is not a special effect from Hollywood.
I'm going to stick this needle into my skin and push it through, until it exits on the other side.
If you get a bad case of the vapors, I've shown this to a few friends last night in the hotel room, and some people I didn't know, and one woman almost passed out.
I suggest that if you get a headache, you look away for the next 30 seconds. Or, you know what, I'll do the first difficult part here.
(You can see it, but you can also turn away if you want to.)
NA: So, it's like, right here, where my meat starts, at the bottom of my arm, I'm just going to make a little incision.
I'm really sorry. Does that make you crazy?
Now, just a little bit through my skin and on the other side.
Now we're in the same situation we were in with the message trick.
About.
But now you can't count my fingers, can you?
I'll show you. This is one, two, three, four, five.
Now, well,
I know what people think when they see this.
"Okay, he is definitely not so stupid and he cuts himself the skin, just to talk to us for a few minutes."
Well, then, I'll show you.
How does this look? Pretty good.
Yes, I know. (Laughter) And people behind say: "Okay. I didn't see it correctly."
The people in the back are coming in now.
Let me show you from close up.
This is really my skin. This is not a special effect from Hollywood.
This is my meat, and I can turn it around.
Sorry. If you get hurt, look away, don't look at it.
The people in the back or the ones who will see this later on will say, "Well, yes, it looks really impressive, but if it really was, he would - see, here is a hole and there, if it really was, it would bleed."
Let me bleed a little for you.
Yes, here it is.
Normally I would take the needle out.
I would clean my arm and show you that there are no wounds.
But I think in this framework here and with the intention of making something real out of a deception, I will leave the needle there and go on stage.
We will meet again in the next few days.
I hope you're already excited about it. Thank you.
Hello everyone. Because I'm the first time at TED, I decided to bring along an old friend who will help me break the ice.
Yes, that's Barbie.
She is 50 years old. And she still looks so young.
But I'd like to present you a face that perhaps you don't know.
This is fulla. Fulla is the Arabic answer to Barbie.
Barbie and Fulla live in completely separate rooms.
(Laughter) You have different interests. You have different values.
And if they ever meet again, they should …
Now, I have to tell you, that will be very uncomfortable.
My experience with the Islamic world is very different.
Where I work, in the Arab world, people are very receptive to western innovations and turn them into something that is neither conventional nor traditional.
"I would like to show you two examples."
4Shbab.
This is a new Arabic TV channel.
Videos from all over the world.
The USA.
The Arabic world.
So what is called the Islamic MTV.
His initiator, an Egyptian TV producer named Ahmed Abou Haïba, wants young people to be inspired by Islam, to lead a better life.
He means that this message is best delivered through the hugely popular medium of music videos.
4Shbab was created as an alternative to already existing Arabic music senders.
And they look like this:
"That's Haifa Wehbe. She's a Lebanese popstar and a pan-Arab pin-up girl."
In the world of 4Shbab, it's not about sex.
But it's not just about hellfire.
The music videos are supposed to show a more friendly, a more gentle face of Islam to help young people in the challenges of life.
My second example is aimed at a somewhat younger audience.
It's called "The 99".
These are the first Islamic superheroes of the world.

His aim is to liberate Islam from the images of intolerance, and to do that in a kind format.
The 99 figures of "Die 99" are supposed to represent the 99 attributes of Allah, such as justice, wisdom and compassion.
There is the figure Noora.
She is supposed to have the gift of being able to look into people and see the good and the bad in them.
Jami is another character, and she has the ability to create fantastic things.
"99" is not only a comic.
There's now a leisure park with them.
And a trick film is being made right now.
And in about a year, heroes like Superman and Wonder Woman will be connected to the "99" to fight the injustice wherever they encounter it.
"The 99" and 4Shbab are only two examples of this Islamic intercultural hybridization.
We’re not talking about a struggle of cultures here.
(Laughter) It's not about a one-size-fits-all.
I see it as a kind of network of civilizations, in which the threads of different cultures are interwoven.
Even though 4Shbab and "Die 99" may look brand new, they are based on a very long tradition.
Islam has always borrowed from other civilisations and adapted to them, in the ancient and modern times.
Finally, it is the Koran itself that encourages us to learn from one another.
Well, in my opinion, those are pretty wise words, no matter which religion you belong to. Thank you.
Can geographic information help you get healthy?
2001 was a train hit me.
My train was a heart attack.
I woke up in a hospital, in an intensive care unit, where I was recovering from a major operation.
Suddenly I realized that I was completely lost in the dark.
I started asking myself, "Why am I?"
"Why now?" "Why here?" "Why now?" "Why here?" "Why now?" "Why here?" "Why now?" "Why here?" "Why now?" "Why here?" "Why now?" "Why here?" "Why now?" "Why here?" "Why now?" "Why here?" "Why now?" "Why here?" "Why now?" "Why here?"
"Could my doctor have warned me?"
What I want to do in these few minutes that I have with you is to talk to you about the formula of life and good health.
Genetics, lifestyle and environment.
In a way, this includes our risks and if we manage these risks, we will lead a good life, a good and healthy life.
Now, I understand the part of genetics and the way of life.
And you know why I understand that?
Because my doctors keep asking me questions about it.
Have you ever had to fill out one of these long, side-by-side questionnaires with your doctor?
And if you're lucky, you can do this again, right?
And again and again. And you ask questions about your lifestyle and your family history, which medications you take, which operations you had, what allergies you have... have I forgotten anything?
But I didn't really understand this part of the equation. And I think my doctors didn't really understand this part of the equation.
What does that mean, my environment?
Now, it can mean many things.
This is my life. This is my life's space.
We all have.
While I'm speaking, I want to think about where you've already lived.
Just think about it, wander through your life and think about it.
Now you will clearly see that you live your life in different places.
At the end of the day, at the end of the work.
If you are like me, you spend a lot of your time in airplanes.
It's not so easy to answer when someone asks, "Where do you live, where do you work, and where do you spend your whole time?"
"And where are you exposed to risks that you might not see at all?"
Every time I try it myself, I come to the conclusion that I spend around 75% of my time at a relatively small number of places.
Most of the time I don't really get away from it, although I am a very wide-eyed wanderer.
Now I will take you on a little trip.
I started in Scranton, Pennsylvania.
I don't know if anyone from the northeast Pennsylvania area is here, but I spent my first 19 years in that area.
And, imagine I've been breathing in high concentrations of sulfur dioxide, carbon dioxide, and methane in unequal amounts for 19 years.
If you've ever been to this part of the country, you'll see these hills burning with burning, glowing coal.
I decided to leave this part of the world. And I went to the middle west.
So I ended up in Louisville Kentucky.
And I decided to stay in the vicinity of Rubbertown.
(Applause) There you put plastic there. You use large amounts of chloroprene and benzene.
For 25 years my now middle-aged lungs have been breathing in different concentrations of that.
It always looked like a clear day there, you didn't see anything of it.
It was really homely and really there.
I decided to become smart. I would take this position on the West Coast.
And I went to Redlands in California.
Very nice, and there I filled my older, senior lungs, as I like to call them, with particulate matter, carbon dioxide and very high doses of ozone.
Fast the highest in the whole country.
And so it looks on a good day.
If you have ever been there, you know what I'm talking about.
Is this picture not correct?
Now, here's a huge gap.
The only thing that never happened to my doctor is that he never asked me where I've already lived.
I can't remember ever being asked by a doctor: "Where have they lived so far?"
No one has wanted to know what quality the water had that I took into my mouth, or the food that I took into my stomach.
This will not be
Look at the available data.
These data come from all over the world -- countries spend billions of dollars on research to develop such products.
I have marked the places where I have lived.
If I wanted to deliberately have a heart attack, I was at the right places. Is that right?
How many people live in the white areas?
How many people here in the room have spent most of their lives in the white regions?
Is there anyone? You have really good luck.
How many have lived in the red areas?
Oh, not so good.
There are thousands of such cards, which are depicted in Atlantean on the whole world.
You give us a feeling for what will be the next train.
But none of that is in my medical record.
And not in your.
Here is my friend Paul.
He is a colleague. He left his mobile phone on, all day, every day, for the last two years, everywhere he has been.
As you can see, he has been well received in the USA.
And here's where he spent the most time.
If you look into it more closely, you get some hints as to what Paul likes to do.
Has anyone got an idea? Skid-racing. Right.
'We can come here and see where Paul really spent most of his time.'
And all these black dots are places where gases are released, which are monitored by the EPA.
Did you know that there are these data?
For every community in the United States, you can have your own personalized map of it.
Now, our mobile phones can actually build a story of our home addresses.
So Paul did it, with his iPhone.
It could look like this.
That could be the doctor in front of us, if we go into practice instead of paying our fees.
This is what my little report would look like.
And he sees it and he says, "Bill, man, I'm telling you, you're going to have to get off your ass and get out of the nice California where it's always warm in the evening, and you're going to have to start jogging at 6 o'clock in the evening."
I think that's a bad idea, Bill, when I look at this report here.
What I want to give you is two recipes.
The first thing we have to teach doctors is how valuable geographic information is.
That's called geomedicine. There are about half a dozen programs on the planet that are working on it.
And they are in the early stages of their development.
These programs need to be supported. And we need to make clear to the future doctors of this world how important some of these information are that I've told you today.
The second thing we have to do, while we are spending billions and billions of dollars all over the world to create an electronic health record, is to make sure that the geographic history also comes into that medical record.
This will not only be important for the doctor; but also for the researchers, who will have a huge amount of data at their disposal.
But it will also be useful for us.
If I had known this information, I could have decided not to go to the ozone capital of the United States. Or? I could have decided to go.
I could have negotiated with my employer in the best interest of me and my company.
Jack Lord said this all already 10 years ago.
Look at this for a moment.
That was the conclusion of the Dartmouth Atlas of Health Care, which showed that we can explain the geographic variations in health care and how our health care system actually works.
That was it, what he meant by that quote.
And I think he was right to do that, about a year ago.
I wish we could take this opportunity and put these data into our medical records.
Let me conclude with the fact that in my specific conception of health geography is always of importance.
And I think that geographical information can really help you and me. Thank you.
We drown in news.
Alone Reuters brings three million news items per year.
And that's just one of the sources.
How many of these messages will actually mean something in the long run?
This is the idea behind "The Long News",
a project of the "Long Now Foundation", which was founded by TED-members Kevin Kelly and Stewart Brand.
What we are looking for are messages that may be of importance even in 50 or 100 or 10,000 years.
When we look at our news through a filter like this, a lot of them get lost.
Let's see the top news of this year. Will this be important in a decade?
Or this one?
Or this?
Really?
Will this matter in 50 or 100 years?
Indeed, this was cool.
But the top news of last year was the economy. But I bet that sooner or later this recession of yesterday will be snow.
What kind of stories could be important for the future?
Let's take the area of medicine.
One day, little robots will move through our blood stream and repair us.
This is a beautiful day, if you are a mouse.
Some recent news: Nanobacteria destroy tumors with real bacteria. You can inject genes into the brain. A robot can crawl through the human body.
"How are we going to feed nine billion people?"
We have problems today, six billion people are starving.
As we heard yesterday, there are over a billion people who are starving.
Britain will starve without genetically modified crops.
Bill Gates has luckily bet a billion on agriculture.
How's the world politics?
The world will change very much if and when China has the say, and that could be good.
China has replaced the United States as the world's largest market for automobiles. It has replaced Germany as the world's largest exporter. And it has started to perform DNA tests on children to influence their career prospects.
We are working on a lot of possibilities to expand our knowledge.
A microbe wakes up after 120,000 years.
It seems as if life will go on with or without us.
But my choice for the top-long-news-story of the year was the discovery of water on the moon.
It makes it easier to
If it's not NASA, maybe China, or someone in this room writes a big check.
My message is that some messages are more important than others.
2008 was the year of Cyclone Nargis in Myanmar.
Millions of people needed urgent help.
The U.N. wanted to bring people and aid to the region.
But there were no maps, no maps of streets, no maps with hospitals, no way for helpers to reach the victims of the gas.
If we look at a map of Los Angeles or London, it is hard to believe that only 15% of the world was mapped to a geo-coded detail level by 2005.
The U.N. suddenly found itself confronted with a problem that even the majority of the world's population faces: no detailed maps.
Help was already on the way.
At Google, 40 volunteers used a new software to map 120,000 kilometers of roads, 3,000 hospitals, logistics and evacuation points.
"They needed only four days."
Which new software they used? Google Mapmaker.
Google Mapmaker is a method that allows everyone to map everything they know about their immediate surroundings.
"This software has been used to map everything from streets to rivers, from schools to local shops and from video stores to Aunt-Emma-Ladies-Clothing-Shops."
Cards are important.
The key to economic development for many developing countries is to unlock the vast amounts of unclaimed land.
For example, all the property in India is worth three billion dollars and is unused.
In the last year alone, thousands of users have cartographically documented millions of information in 170 countries and created a map with a precision that was previously considered impossible.
This was only possible through the combined power of passionate users worldwide.
Let's take a look at some of the maps that are currently being created by users.
While we are talking here, people are cartographing the world in these 170 countries.
You can see Bridget in Africa, who just mapped a road in Senegal.
Or, closer to us, Chalua, who has mapped out a narrow-gauge railway in Bangalore.
This is the result of numerical geometry, machine learning and machine teaching.
It's the victory of thousands of users in hundreds of cities, users for users, edits for edits.
It's an invitation to the 70 percent of our planet that is still unexplored.
Welcome to the new world.
I only have 3 minutes, so I will speak quickly. And it will use your mental cycles - multitasking can become difficult.
27 years ago I got a ticket that made me think.
(Laughter) I had some time to think about it.
And with energy efficiency it's about more than just the vehicle. It's also about the street.
Street design makes a difference, especially intersections, where there are two types: Ampelkreuzungen and the ones without the Ampel, which means stop signs.
50% of all accidents happen at intersections.
Circle of life is much better.
A study of 24 intersections found that accidents dropped by 40% when an intersection was converted to a roundabout.
Unfälle with injuries went down 76% and fatal injuries went down 90%.
But that's just the safety.
What about time and gasoline?
A flowing traffic means less brakes, which means less acceleration, less fuel and less pollution, less wasted time, and that explains part of the better efficiency on European roads, compared to the US.
Crossings without traffic lights, with stop signs, save many lives, but there is an over-abundance of them.
Small circles begin to appear.
This is one in my neighborhood. And they are much better - better than traffic lights, better than 4-way stop signs.
AK: They are expensive to install, but it is more expensive to not build them. We should be working on that.
But they're not applicable in all situations.
Take for example a 3-way intersection.
(Laughter) It is logical that you would have a sign there on the small street that leads to the big street.
But the other two are a bit dubious.
Here is one. There are others I have seen.
Cars appear very rarely on this third street.
So the question is, what does it cost us?
"This intersection, which I observed, had about 3,000 cars per day in both directions, and that's 2 ounces (56 grams) of gasoline per car."
That's every time 5 cents, every 3,000 autos per day, total 51,000$ per year.
That's just the cost of gasoline. There's also the pollution, rusting of the car, and time.
What is the time worth?
Now, at 10 seconds per 3,000 cars, that's 8.3 hours per day. The average wage in the United States
It is 20$ per hour. That is 60.000$ per year.
Together with the gasoline, and it's 112,000$ per year just for this sign in both directions.
If you add this to the present value of 5%, you get over 2 million dollars for a stop sign in both directions.
If you look at the neighboring property, you could buy that, cut down the trees, improve the view, and sell it.
And you would still win.
"Why is that there?"
Why is there a stop sign in both directions?
Because it saves lives. But is there a better way to achieve this goal?
The answer is to allow cars to come from this side of the street safely.
There are many people who may live there and if they have to wait for a long time, a long line may form because the cars on the main road don't stop.
Can this be achieved with existing signs?
There is a long history of stop signs and traffic signs.
It's great.
Why don't we use a pedigree?
Now, because you have to give precedence to the right.
You have to wait until all five cars are ready before you can go. It's always on the side street, so the main street has priority.
Now, it is difficult to create a new meaning for an existing sign.
You can't suddenly tell everyone: "Okay, you know what you should do when you're driving? That's going to change now."
This would not work.
What the world needs now is a new kind of flag.
And there would be a little guide for those who don't get public announcements.
And it combines the stop sign with the handicapped symbol.
It's a bit like a T.
Unusual events lead to caution.
If people come into an unfamiliar situation, for which they have no behavioral pattern, they will be slower.
Now that you all are "way-learned"...
Don't wait for this sign to appear, these things don't change quickly.
But you all are members of your communities, and you can use your influence to create more sensible traffic flows.
So, with the change of the vehicle, you can have a bigger impact on the environment than if you change the vehicle in your neighborhood.
For those of you who have never seen dancing bears, this is a dancing bear.
We started a two-year investigation into what was going on.
Clearly, the lips of the bears in the wild have been dezimatized.
This is the Kalandar community, an Islamic minority group that lives scattered throughout India and has been there since the 13th century.
We started to collect data about what was going on.
These are film clips taken with a hidden camera.
We went into the store and bought ourselves.
And we found this, in the middle of the state of Karnataka.
The bears were collected from all over the country and sold and traded.
These here were sold for about $2,000 per piece. They're used for berry tea, but they're also trained to become tanners, just like the one they just saw.

The couple here is just 18 years old.
"They have already had four children, as you can see here."
The economic well-being of the family depended on these animals.
We had to solve the problem very pragmatically and sustainably.
When we started to get more serious about it, we found out that it was illegal.
They could have been sentenced to up to seven years in prison if they had been arrested by the authorities.
What they were supposed to do to this bear was really terrible.
Completely unacceptable.
The bears are usually killed.
The boys who were taken away will be separated.
Their teeth will just be pulled out with a metal rod.
(Laughter) And then you use a hot poker to poke a hole through their nose.
(Applause) So begann ich, diese Leute zu ändern und ihnen abzugewöhnen, und stattdessen etwas anderes zu machen.
This is Bitu Kalandar, our attempt to find a solution.
We were pretty unsure if it would work.
We were not at all sure, but we managed to convince him.
We said to him: "Okay, here is a little start money."
(Laughter) So we got the bear out of the cage. We set up a bear sanctuary. We have four of these sanctuaries in India.
And now, Bitu sells chilled drinks on the side of the highway.
It has its own telephone number.
And when the thing had started, there was no going back.
This is Sadua, who came to us and gave us his bears.
Today he owns a dairy and a grain business in the vicinity of Agra.
And then our gaze was only directed forward.
We gave the people a bicycle rickshaw.
We set up carpet webbing machines and offered training for women.
It was not allowed for women to leave their community and work in the mainstream society. So we could also help.
Training. The children have never been to school.
They had only an Islamic education, a very small one.
You were never allowed to go to school because you were making extra money at home. But we managed to provide them with an education.
We are currently funding 600 education programs for children.
We were able to save this person a better future.
Of course we had to do something for the bears.
The bears look like us when they come to us.
And so, when we have treated them.
We have veterinary hospitals in our rescue centers.
In 2002 there were about 12,000 drummers.
We rescued over 550 drummers.
We were able to provide both humans and bears a better future.
The great news I'm going to announce today is that we will be bringing the last remaining bear in India to our rescue center in the next month.
And India must not have to witness such cruel and barbaric practices that are being carried out here for centuries.
And people can be proud of themselves.
The people of Kalandar will overcome this terrible past in which they've lived their lives.
And the beautiful bears can live in the wild again.
And there will be no more de-extinction of these bears.
And both the children and the bears can live in peace. Thank you.
First of all, I am a freak.
"I am a vegetarian, and the CO2 balance minimizes the robotic surgery freak."
I really want to build sustainably, but I'm very suspicious of all these articles that tell me how to do it, but don't tell me how it works.
I have to find it out myself.
Is this bad?
I have spilled a jar of bio-yoghurt from happy, self-realizing cows on my workbench and now I want to use a kitchen scraper to clean it up.
Well, that wasn't fast enough for me, so I put on my turn signal, and I walked around him, and as I walked, I looked to see what he was doing, and he was doing this.
This is the amount of energy and water that is in every single sheet of kitchen paper. Every time I use a sheet of kitchen paper, I use exactly this amount of virtual energy and water.
Wash and throw away!
If I compare that with a cotton handkerchief that I can use a thousand times, I don't use much grey energy. Until I wash the handkerchief that has been used to wipe the yogurt.
This is the energy used for this.
unless, unless I throw my towel into a washing machine, I put energy and water into the towel.
I use a high-efficiency front loader washer. Then it looks better.
But what about a recycled kitchen cauldron that also has only half as many leaves?
Then the kitchen sink is better at that.
Oh, shit, let's take a jellyfish.
I wash it with a sponge, and rinse it under running water, and so I’m using much less energy, but much more water.
If you set the water heater on "hot" from the start, you even use more energy.
You let the water run until it is warm, to wash the towel.
Now anything is possible.
What this shows is that sometimes the things that you least expect, like the temperature of the water heater, can have a bigger impact than all the other things that you've been trying to optimize.
Someone who is twisted like me wants to build a house.
That's exactly what my husband and I are doing.
We wanted to know how environmentally friendly we could be.
There are thousands of printed articles that tell us how to do it best.
All of them are equally unreliable, since they advise us to optimize all possible nonsense, while forgetting the forest for the sake of the trees.
A typical house uses about 300 MWh of energy. That's the energy you need to build it. Millions and billions of paper towels.
We wanted to know how we could do this better.
We start out with a house on a lot. I'll show you a typical housebuilding and below that what we do.
First we cut it off.
To that end, one needs to expend some energy, but if one recycles and reuses the parts, one can recover some of that energy.
We dug a big hole and installed a rainwater tank to have a rainwater source for the garden.
Then we poured a massive foundation to use the passive solar technology.
You can reduce the energy consumption by about 25 percent by using self-densifying concrete.
Then we started to build the wall.
This is the raw material, wood, that is used to make the device. It is not easy to recover the energy that is used, but it can be a sustainable resource if you use certified wood from a forest that is certified by the forest industry.
And then we made a first experience that was very surprising for us:
If we put aluminum windows in the house, we would double the energy consumption at this point.
PVC is a bit better, but still not as good as the wood we chose.
Then we installed the gas water pipes, the electric, heating, ventilation and cooling, and the isolation.
Sprühschaum is an excellent isolator, it penetrates into all the cracks, but it is connected with a high energy cost. In comparison, Sprüh-Cellulose or Blue Jeans is a much cheaper alternative.
We took straw balls as filler for our library, which come completely without any gray energy.
When the EcoRock-Platten were installed, we used about a quarter of the energy of a standard Rigipsplatte.
Then there are the end-tasks, the main topic of all those eco-articles. They really don't weigh much in relation to the overall building.
Despite all that, the whole press is focused on it.
Not on the floor.
But if you move carpet in your house, it still makes a tenth of the gray energy of the entire house.
We built a house with less than half the energy use of a normal house.
Before we start clapping our own backs, we have used 151 MWh of energy to build this house, while a previous house stood on that spot.
So the question is, how can we balance this energy use?
If I estimate the energy consumption of my new house and compare it with the old one, it will take about six years.
If I had renovated the old house to achieve a higher energy efficiency, it would take more than 20 years to reach the profitability threshold.
And if I hadn't been looking for energy savings, we would have needed over 50 years to reach the break-even point.
What does that mean?
In the order of magnitude of the energy consumption of my house, this is about equivalent to what I would consume in a year with my car. Or about five times as much as if I were a total vegetarian.
But my elephant in my living room flies.
Really, I have to go home by foot.
All calculations for energy recovery are available in the blog.
And not forget: Sometimes, it's the things that you don't expect that make the biggest changes.
(Applause)
I always have my dictionary at hand, but I never really looked up the meaning of the word "behindert".
I'll read you the entry.
"Hindered", Adjektiv: "verkrüppelt, hilflos, nutzlos, zerstört, abgestorben, verstümmelt, verwundet, zugerichtet, lahm, abgetrennt verwahrlost, ausgedient, geschwächt
Healthy, strong, capable."
I read this list to a friend and had to laugh at first, it sounded so ridiculous, but I only got to "zugerichtet" and couldn't go on, and had to stop reading and collect myself after this overwhelming flood of words and the emotional shock that came with it.
Of course, this was a very old, outdated synonym dictionary. I just thought that the edition must be quite old.
But in fact it was an output in the early 80s when I just started school and began to build my self-image outside of my family's social environment and to shape my own world around me.
And thank God I didn't use a thesaurus then.
If I take this entry seriously, I would be born into a world where someone like me would be seen as a person whose life has no positive outcome. Today, however, I will celebrate the chances and adventures I have experienced.
I immediately went to the online version of 2009 and expected to find a more appealing article.
Here is the updated version of this entry.
Stupidly, it's not much better.
In particular, the last two words under "Near Antonyms" "quite" and "healthy" are disturbing.
But it's not just about the words.
It's about what we think about the people we describe with these words.
It's about the values that are in these words, and how we construct these values.
Our language influences our thinking and how we see the world and people around us.
Many ancient societies, including the Greeks and Romans, really believed that the pronunciation of a prayer could have a great power, because what you say aloud can manifest itself.
What do we really want to manifest – a disabled person or a powerful person?
Alone, to call a human being a child without any consideration, might be enough to limit them and to give them ideas.
Wouldn't it be nicer if you could open the doors?
A man who opened the door for me was my pediatrician at the A.I. Dupont Institute in Wilmington in Delaware.
He's called Dr. Pizzutillo. An Italian-American whose name, as you can imagine, most Americans could not pronounce correctly. So, he was always called Dr. P.
And Dr. P. always carried very colorful butterflies and was just as good at work with children as he was.
I found the time I spent in this hospital to be just awesome – except for my physiotherapy.
I had to repeat the same exercises over and over again with these thick, elastic bands -- in different colors -- you know, to build up my leg muscles. And I hated those bands. I hated them. I cursed them. I hated them.
And imagine, I even tried to stop this practice as a five-year-old child with Dr. P. and without success.
He said one day, "Wow, Aimee, you are such a strong, powerful and young girl, you will one day break one of these bands.
And if you can do it, I'll give you a hundred dollars.
Dr. P. made me see the horror of my daily exercises with new eyes.
And I wonder today how much his vision of me as a strong and powerful young girl shaped my self-image and how I could imagine myself as a strong, powerful, athletic person.
That is just one example of many, how adults can influence the imagination of a child.
Our language doesn't give us any room to imagine what we all want: it's ability to each of us to see ourselves as powerful people.
Our language lags behind societal changes, which in many cases were triggered by a technological change.
From a medical standpoint, of course, you can say that my legs, the laser surgery for my eyes, artificial knees for my knees, artificial hips for older bodies that allow people to really use all their abilities and develop beyond the limits that their natural fate has set for them, not to mention social networking platforms, allow people to create their own identity, define themselves in their own way, and group
(Video) Perhaps this technological change makes it clearer than ever that there is always another truth, namely, that everyone in society has something very special and very powerful to contribute and that the human ability to adapt is our greatest asset.
The human ability to adapt to adversity - that's an interesting story because people keep asking me to tell them how I deal with adversity and I'll tell you something: This sentence never felt right to me and I've always felt very uncomfortable answering questions about it and I think I'm starting to understand why.
This sentence lives on the idea that success or happiness depends on how you deal with challenges, without being influenced by the experience that comes with it. As if my life would be so successful because I could avoid the possible pitfalls of life with a prosthesis, or how people perceive me with my disability.
The truth is, we are shaped by the challenge, whether it is physical, emotional or both.
And I claim that this is good.
Illicit activities are not a barrier that we have to overcome in order to get clear with our lives.
We have to live with difficulties.
And I tend to see obstacles as my shadow.
Sometimes I notice that he is very present, sometimes he is hardly visible, but he is always with me.
I do not want to downgrade the effect or the severity of the struggle of a human being.
There are in life difficulties and challenges, and they are only too real, and every person goes about it differently. But the question is not whether we can get clear about them, but how we can get clear about them.
We are also not only responsible for protecting the people we love, but also for preparing them for the future.
And we don't do them any favors by giving them the feeling that they can't adjust.
You have to clearly separate the medical fact that you are amputated and the social opinion about whether you are disabled or not.
The only real and lasting disability I had to deal with was that the world kept telling me that it could describe me with these definitions.
We want to protect the people who are closest to our hearts and tell them the cold, hard truth about their medical prognosis or even a prognosis for their quality of life, which they expect, but we must be careful not to lay the foundation for someone to actually be disabled.
Perhaps the current concept of what is broken is only concerned with what is broken and how we repair it for each individual, a greater disability than the pathology itself.
If we don't treat a person holistically, and don't take into account all his/her strengths and abilities, we will create an additional disease.
We degrade a person who has value for our society.
We must look beyond the pathology and focus on all human possibilities.
The most important thing is that there is a connection between our perception of our shortcomings and our great inventor spirit.
We should not underestimate or ignore these challenging times, we should neither try to avoid them, nor should we turn our backs on them. It is about recognizing opportunities in the difficulties.
EM: Well, I think it's more about saying that we don't have to overcome all the difficulties, but that we are open to embracing them, to embracing them with a hug, to embracing them on the head, to use a boxing expression, and perhaps even to dance with them.
And maybe we will be able to see rigidity as something natural, harmonious and useful, and feel ourselves not so burdened by their presence.
This year we celebrate the 200th birthday of Charles Darwin and as he wrote about evolution before 150 years ago, Darwin, in my opinion, pointed to something very true about human nature.
Not the strongest of his kind, and not the smartest of his kind, but the one who can best adapt to change.
From conflicts comes creativity.
Not only from Darwin's work do we know that the ability of the human being to survive and to evolve is determined by the struggle of the human mind.
Change and adaptation are the greatest human abilities.
And maybe we will only know what kind of wood we are made of when we are really tested.
Maybe that's the meaning of suffering, a perception of the self, a feeling of our own power.
We can buy ourselves something.
We can give meaning to suffering that goes beyond the heavy times.
Perhaps we can see the change as a disturbance.
We haven't adapted to it yet.
I think the biggest damage we have done to ourselves is to believe that we are normal.
Honestly - who is normal?
There is no normal.
There is the usual. The usual. But not the normal. And would you really want to know this poor, grey person if there really was one?
I think not.
It would be great if we could exchange this pattern of normality against another pattern of possibilities or strength to even make it a little bit more dangerous. So we can release the forces of many children and invite them to bring their very special and valuable abilities into the society.
Anthropologists have found that we humans have always demanded of our members of society that they be useful and contribute.
There are hints that even Neanderthals, 60,000 years ago, older people and people with severe physical injuries, carried and that happened perhaps because the experience of life in the survival struggle of these people was valuable for society:
They didn't view these people as worthless and useless; they viewed them as something special and valuable.
I stood there in front of a 37-liter (ca. 1.5 gallons) bucket of tomatoes.
It was summer and I had shorts on.
And I hear a guy behind me say, "Well, if it isn't Aimee Mullins."
And I turn around and see this older man. I had no idea who he was.
"Excuse me, Sir, do we know each other? I can't remember."
Well, you hardly remember me.
"When I first saw you, I pulled you out of your mother's belly."
Oh, so der.
And of course it clicked.
"That was Dr. Kean, a man I only knew from my mother's stories, because I came two weeks late for my birthday."
The doctor who performed my mother's prenatal diagnosis was on vacation, and so my parents didn't know the man who brought me into the world at all.
Because I was born without legs and my feet were turned towards them, and I had only a few toes on this foot and a few on the other foot, he was the one who had to bring the bad news.
He told me that I had to tell your parents that you would never run and never be as agile as other children or that you would never have an independent life and since then you have just been punished for lying to me.
Really amazing that he collected newspaper clippings of my entire childhood, whether I won a book-writing contest in second grade, whether I was on the pathfinders at Halloween, whether I won a scholarship or one of my athletic victories, and he used these newspaper clippings to teach his students, medical students from the Hahnemann Medical School and the Hershey Medical School.
And he called this part of his course the X factor, the potential of human will.
You can't say enough about how important this factor is for the quality of life of a human being.
Dr. Kean continued, "I've learned that children, if they don't get constant input and if they get a little bit of support, if you leave them to themselves, children can achieve a lot."
Look, Dr. Kean has changed his mind.
(Applause) He understood that the medical diagnosis, and how someone deals with it, are two different things.
And I have changed my mind over time, when they asked me at the age of 15 if I had changed my mind about exchanging my bones for bones made of meat, I would have had no hesitation.
I wanted to act normally back then.
If you ask me today, I'm not so sure.
Because I experienced something with my feet and not TROTZ this experience.
And maybe this change could also happen because I have met so many people who opened doors for me instead of people who wanted to close them or interrupt me.
You just need one person to demonstrate to you how you can manifest your powers, and you are through.
If you can make it possible for someone to activate his own inner forces, the human mind is so receptive – if you can do that, and open a door for someone in a crucial moment, then you are a very good teacher for these people.
They open doors for themselves.
The real meaning of the word "educate" (to bring up) is rooted in the word "educate" (to develop).
It means to bring out the potential in something.
What potential do we want to unlock?
In the 60s, a study was done in Britain. Schools were converted to comprehensive schools.
You call that there "streaming trials" (streaming trials) in the USA, we call that "tracking" (tracking).
The students are divided into groups (A, B, C, D and so on) and each group is given a set of notes (A, B, C, D and so on).
And the A students are more difficult to evaluate, get the better teachers, etc.
Then, after a three-month period, they gave the students with a "sufficient" (D) the note "Very good" (A). They were told that they were asses, that they were very smart. And after these three months, they really wrote the exam.
This geo-engineering idea, in it's simplest form, is basically the following.
And that was how it was after the three months.
But only those who were still in school – except for the students who had left school.
The most important thing about this study was that the teachers were not involved.
The teachers didn't know that something had changed.
They were just told that they were the ones who were going to be the ones who were going to be the ones who were going to be the ones who were going to be the ones who were going to be the ones who were going to be the ones who were going to be the ones who were going to be the ones who were going to be the ones who were going to be the ones who
The only real disability is a broken spirit, a spirit that has been broken, that has no hope. He finds nothing more beautiful. He has lost our natural, childlike curiosity. And our ability to imagine.
But if we can support the human spirit in the hope that we will continue to find ourselves and others around us, curious and imaginative, then we will really put our energies positively into it.
If a spirit has this quality, we can create a new reality and a new form of being.
"The God who knows only four words." "Every child knows God, not the God of names, not the God of prohibitions, but the God who knows only four words and who constantly repeats them, he says: Come, dance with me."
Come on, dance with me. Thank you.
I am a writer and journalist and I am also a very curious person. In 22 years as a journalist I have learned many new things.
Three years ago, I learned to become invisible.
I became one of the working homeless.
I gave up my job as a newspaper editor after my father died in February of the same year, and decided to travel.
His death had deeply affected me.
And there were many things that I wanted to focus on during the trip.
I have been camping for a long time. And so I decided to live for a year in a small bus like a camping trip.
I took my cat, my Rottweiler and my camping equipment in a 1975 Chevy-bus and drove off, without however three very important things:
That society sets the value of a person's life at the same level as that of a house.
I didn't notice how quickly negative perceptions of other people can collide with our reality when we allow it.
I wasn't aware that homelessness is an attitude and not a lifestyle.
At the beginning of life, life was great.
I washed up on camping sites. I went regularly to eat.
I had time to relax and mourn.
But then the anger and depression set in because of my father's death.
My professional job has finished and I had to take a full-time job to pay my bills.
What started as a mild spring became a hot summer.
It was impossible to park anywhere without revealing that I had a cat and a dog with me. And it was really hot.
The cat came and went through an open window in the bus.
The dog went to a dog-boarding facility.
I sweated.
Whenever I could, I used the bathrooms in office buildings and rest stops.
Or I washed myself in public toilets.
Nacht was it in the bus hardly colder than 26°C, which made it difficult or impossible to sleep.
Eating made me fat in the heat.
The ice in my refrigerator melted within hours, and my life was just miserable.
I could not afford a house, at least not one that allowed the Rottweiler and the cat.
I refused to let them go. So I stayed in the bus.
And whenever the heat made me too weak to go to the public toilet outside my bus at night, I used a bucket and a garbage can as a toilet.
with the beginning of the winter rains, the temperatures dropped under the freezing point. And there they stayed.
I was confronted with a series of completely new challenges.
I parked wherever I could to avoid getting caught and problems with the police.
I didn't always succeed.
Instead of feeling like I was in control of my life, I felt like I was losing control.
I don't know when or how it happened, but the pace at which I went from being a talented writer and journalist to homeless woman on the bus was astonishing.
I didn't change. My IQ wasn't lowered.
My abilities, my character, my moral convictions, everything was the same to me.
And yet I had changed somehow.
I sank deeper and deeper into a depression.
(Applause) Until someone pointed me to an emergency shelter for the homeless.
I went there. I hadn't washed for three days.
I smelled and was depressed, just like everyone else in the waiting line.
I wasn't drunk or high.
And when some of the homeless people, including a former university professor, noticed, they said, "You're not really homeless. Why are you really here?"
Other homeless people also didn't see me as homeless, but I saw myself as homeless.
Then the professor heard my story and said, "You have work. You have hope."
"Real homeless people have no hope."
The drugs that they gave me in the hospital to treat my depression led to suicidal thoughts. And I still remember how I thought: "If I were to commit suicide now, nobody would notice."
A friend of mine told me shortly after that, that she had heard, that Tim Russert, a famous journalist here in the U.S., had talked about me on TV.
A paper I wrote about my father, in which year he died, was in Tim's new book.
He made this talk show round. And he spoke about my texts.
And when I realized that Tim Russert, the former moderator of "Meet the Press", was talking about my writings while I was living in a bus on a Wal-Mart parking lot, I began to laugh.
And you should also laugh.
I began to laugh because it had come to the point that I wondered if I was a writer or a homeless person.
I went into a bookstore. And I found Tim's book.
I stand there. And I read my essay again.
And I cried.
Because I was a writer.
I was a writer.
I went back to Tennessee.
SS: I slept in the bus, I slept at friends.
And I started writing again.
In the summer of the following year, I worked again as a journalist.
I won prizes. I lived in my own apartment.
I wasn’t homeless anymore.
And I wasn't any longer invisible.
Thousands of people work in full-time and part-time jobs and live in their cars.
But still stigmatized and criminalized by society, the life in a car or on the road.
The homeless, the working homeless, are mostly invisible.
But if you ever meet someone, show understanding for him, encourage him and give him hope.
The human being can endure a lot if he has hope.
I am not here to be a poster child for the homeless.
I don't want to encourage you to give money to the next beggar you meet.
What matters to people is not where they live, where they sleep, or in which life situation they are at the moment.
Three years ago, I was still living in a little bus on a Wal-Mart parking lot. And today, I'm speaking at TED.
SS: Hope always finds a way. Thank you!
A few years ago I realized how dark the construction industry can be.
In 2006, young students from Katar came to visit me and see the warehouses of migrant workers.
And since then, I have been following the development of the question of worker rights.
In the last six months, the construction of 300 cloud-seeding stations in the VAE (= United Arab Emirates) has been stopped or abandoned.
Behind the headlines about these buildings is the fate of the construction workers, often forced laborers.
1,1 Millionen.
BG: Most of them are Indians, Pakistanis, Sri Lankans and Nepalese, who take high risks to earn money for their families back home.
They pay their employer thousands of dollars to get there.
And when they arrive there, they find themselves in work camps again, without water, without heating, and the passports have been taken away from them.
It is easy to point fingers at local officials and the police, but 99 percent of these people are hired by private citizens. And that is why we are equally responsible for them, even more so.
By now there are organizations like „Buildsafe UAE" (= „Security on construction in the VAE"). But the numbers are just too overwhelming.
In August 2008, the official statistics of the VAE showed that 40 percent of the 1,098 VAE workers had violated the most primitive health and safety rules.
10,000 workers protested last summer over unpaid wages, poor food and cramped living conditions.
And then the financial crisis came.
When the construction companies went bankrupt because they had debts just like everyone else, the immediate consequence was that suddenly everything was gone: work permits, passports and return tickets for all these workers.
Currently, at this very moment, thousands of workers are standing there completely alone.
Without a view of home.
Yes, without being able to prove that they are here.
They are the „boom-and-bust" refugees.
Is one a responsible architect, engineer, builder, who knows what's going on, because we see it every week, if one is self-indulgent or guilty of the violation of human rights?
Forget about our ecological impact
And we think of our moral balance sheet.
What is the use of building a coal-free, energy-saving, architectural wonder if the work that this architectural wonder produces is immoral?
Now someone told me that I chose the main road.
But, honestly, in this question there is no other way.
We should not forget who really pays the price in this financial crisis.
When we think about our next job in the office, about the next building project we get, about our workers.
We should not forget these men who really get themselves into trouble.
Thank you!
What, please, have these three people in common?
You know, the first person you know.
You are all eager "American Idol" viewers.
But you probably didn't recognize Aydah Al Jahani, who is also a candidate, and even a finalist in the so-called "Poet of the Million" competition, which is broadcasted in Abu Dahbi and is seen in the entire Arab world.
In this competition, the participants have to write their own poems and recite them, in the form of Nabati poetry, a traditional form of poetry of the Bedouin.
Lima Sahar was a finalist, and that was in the singer-songwriter competition "Afghan Star".
Before I continue, I want to assure you: Yes, I know that everything began with "Britain's Got Talent".
But the important point of my talk is that I can show you how these performance-oriented competitions, where everyone can participate and where the winner is determined by SMS, are changing the old tribal societies.
I'm focusing on Afghanistan and the Arab world with the VAE, and on how they change their social structures: not by introducing western ideas, but by integrating into the cultural language of these countries.
It starts with fun.
We're coming up short on the "Afghan Star".
We want to see the Afghan star. We come too late.
We are late.
We must hurry if we want to see "Afghan Star".
These shows reach incredibly broad audiences.
In Afghanistan, people take unusual efforts to see this program.
You don't have to have your own TV set.
(Music) ♫ Quiet ♫ ♫ Quiet down, she said ♫ ♫ Speak into the back of his head ♫ ♫ On the edge of the bed, I can see your blood flow ♫ ♫ I can see your ♫ ♫ cells grow ♫ ♫ Hold still awhile ♫ ♫ Don't spill the wine ♫ ♫ I can see
But it goes beyond just watching, because it also involves campaigning for the candidates.
People are so involved that volunteers find themselves, just like the volunteer political campaign workers who go into the rural areas and drum up support for their candidates.
The candidates also make their own commercials.
Of course there are also ethnic groups, but not exclusively.
Because so far the winner has come from another tribe.
It has opened up new possibilities, especially for women.
In the last season there were two women among the finalists.
One of them, Lima Shar, is a Paschtunin from Kandahar, a very conservative region.
(Applause) And here she tells in a film report about how her friends pressured her to not go to the convention, and they told her that she was leaving her friends because of the Democratic Party.
But she also tells us that members of the Taliban actually vote by SMS.
She also took the risk of going public and participating in the "Poet of the Million" competition.
I must say that your husband has been supporting them from the beginning.
But your family and your tribe, they were not going to let them go, and they were very strict about it.
CA: And when they first started to win, they all stood behind her.
It shows that competition and winning are general human values.
Aydah stands up to the one outside.
Her poetry is about women and the life of women within society.
She's a role model for young women. She's a role model for young women here in Abu Dahbi, but also for the viewers.
Well, one should assume that "American Idol" would bring with it a certain amount of Americanization.
But in reality, the opposite happens.
The use of this popular format for the traditional, regional culture, actually leads to a revival of interest in Nabati poetry and traditional dances, as well as traditional costumes and music.
In Afghanistan, where the Taliban had banned music for years, it is now leading to a revival of traditional music.
They don't sing pop songs, they sing Afghan music.
They have learned to lose without getting angry at the winner.
No trifle.
The latest version of this "American Idol"-format, which just came out in Afghanistan, is called "The Candidate".
In this show, the participants present political programs that will be voted on.
Many are too young to run for president, but by speaking out there, they influence the race for the presidency.
That's why I think that what we don't see, the way that reality TV steers the reality.
I thank you.
I began my journey 30 years ago.
I worked in mines and I found out that this was an unknown world.
That's why I wanted to create a work in color and with big format cameras and very big landscapes.
For me, the medium of photography was a key component that allowed us to view these landscapes. Therefore, I believed that photography was the best medium to do this work.
After spending 17 years photographing large industrial landscapes, I realized that oil is the scale and the speed that it increases.
because exactly that has changed, the speed at which we all are depleting our raw materials.
I started to think about a whole series of oil landscapes.
I would like to show the connections, because on the one hand we have the extraction of oil, where we are extracting it from the ground, and the refining. That is the one side of the story.
The other side I wanted to look at was how we use oil, our cities, our vehicles, our automobile culture, where people gather around the vehicle to celebrate it.
And the third side is the idea of the end of oil, this entropic end, where all our parts, our tires, our filters, our helicopters, our planes - where are the places where all this stuff ends up?
I repeat: For me, photography was a way to explore the world and find such places.
On another idea, which I had, an ecologist came up with, he basically made a calculation, and he said, "Well, I'm going to use a liter of gasoline, and I'm going to use this much carbon and this much organic material."
"It was 23 tons for one liter."
Every time I think about this book, I think about the carbon.
I know that oil is produced in the ocean and through phytoplankton. But he did the calculation for our earth and wanted to know what it would have to do to produce this energy.
With plant growth through photosynthesis, it would take 500 years to produce the 30 billion barrels of oil we consume each year.
By doing this, I also became aware of the fact that this is a huge risk for our society.
If you take the figure of 30 billion per year and look at our two biggest suppliers, Saudi Arabia and now Canada with its dirty oil, = If you take the figure of 30 billion per year and look at our two biggest suppliers, Saudi Arabia and now Canada with its dirty oil, dann ist das ein ganz anderes Geschäft. = Then that's a
These two together only cover the demand for about 15 years.
The entire world, with its reserves of 1.2 billion barrels, is just enough to supply us for about 45 years.
That's why the question isn't whether, but when the global oil production ceiling will be reached.
I as a photographer sense that we are now all really starting to have to use all our creative and intellectual abilities to tackle the task that I believe is one of the most difficult problems of our time, how to deal with our energy crisis.
Besides - allow me to make this last remark - I want to see my children in the eyes and tell them that we did everything we could to begin to alleviate the suffering that I believe is one of the most important and critical moments of our time. Thank you very much.
Once upon a time, a long time ago, when I was 24 years old. I was studying at St. John's Medical College in Bangalore.
I took part in a one-month course on health care.
And this changed my thinking for all time.
The course was good, but it was not the course content that changed my thinking.
It was the brutal realization that the Indian students were better than I was on the first morning!
You have to know, I was a total streber.
I loved statistics since I was a little kid.
And I had learned very intensively in Sweden.
I was in the upper quarter of all the classes I attended.
But in St. John's I was in the lower quarter.
The fact was that the Indian students learned much more intensively than we did in Sweden.
They read the book twice, or three times or four times.
We read it once and then we went to the party.
This personal experience was the first time in my life that my ideas of what I wanted to be changed.
And I realized that the western world might not always stay at the top.
I assume many of you had similar personal experiences.
They are personal encounters that can really change our ideas and concepts about the world.
It is not the statistics, even if I tried to make it funny.
And I will now try to predict when Asia will regain its dominant position as the leading part of the world, as it was the case for thousands of years.
That's Rio.
I don't mean the whole economy of India, because it is not a big feat to increase the economy of India, with a billion people, to the size of Great Britain.
But I want to see when the average salary, the money for each person per month in India and China -- when will that be reached by Britain and the United States?
I will start with the historical background.
And you can see my map if I bring it here.
I begin in 1858.
1858 was a year of great technological advances in the West.
It was the year in which Queen Victoria was able to communicate with President Buchanan, via the transatlantic telegraph cable.
They were the first to use Twitter across the Atlantic.
And I found the text of the telegram that President Buchanan sent to Queen Victoria.
This telegraph is a fantastic tool to spread religion, civilization, freedom and law worldwide.
I was curious about what he meant by freedom and for whom.
And we will think about this when we see the larger picture of the world in 1858.
1858 was also a very important year in the history of Asia.
The year 1858 was the year in which the brave uprising against the foreign occupation of India was defeated.
India was still dominated by the outside world for another 89 years.
In China, in 1858, the British troops won the Opium War.
The foreigners were allowed to trade freely in China.
It meant that they were paying for Chinese goods with opium.
Japan had to sign the Harris Treaty, and accept trade conditions favorable to the USA.
They were threatened by these black ships that were anchored in the port of Tokyo for a year.
But Japan, unlike India and China, maintained its national sovereignty.
Let's see how much difference it makes.
I will do this now by bringing back these bubbles into a Gapminder graph, where each bubble represents a country.
The size of the balloon is the same as the population,
This axis stands, as always, for the income per person in comparable dollars.
And on this axis is the life expectancy, the health of the people.
Besides, I bring a new invention.
I have converted the laser pointer here in the green India into an ecological, recyclable version.
Now let's look.
See, 1858 was India here, China was here, Japan was there, the United States and Great Britain were richer, on this side.
(Laughter) I will start the world.
India was not always at this level.
In fact, if we go back to the history books, there was a time before hundreds of years ago when the income per person in India and China was even higher than that of Europe.
But 1850 was a long time since the beginning of the foreign dominance, and India was de-industrialized.
And they can see that the economies of the United States and Great Britain grew.
They were also, at the end of the century, healthier. And the Japanese began to catch up.
India tried it there.
Can you see how it starts to move, here?
But really, independence was good for Japan.
Japan is trying to climb up.
And now we're in the new century. Health is getting better, the United States, the United Kingdom.
Now, please, we are approaching the First World War.
The First World War, you know, now we're going to see many dead and economic problems.
Great Britain goes down.
And now there's also the Spanish flu.
And then, after the First World War, they continued their rise.
Still under foreign rule and without independence, India and China are at the bottom of the table.
It has not changed much.
Your population has grown but that's all there is to it.
Now we are in the 1930s, and you see that Japan goes through a time of war, with a lower life expectancy.
And the Second World War was really a terrible event for Japan, economically as well.
But they recovered pretty quickly.
And we move into the new world.
India finally becomes independent.
They could raise the Indian flag and become an independent nation, but with great difficulty there.
We saw the birth of modern China in a way that the world was surprised.
And what happened?
What happened after the independence?
You can see that the health is starting to improve.
Children started going to school.
Health care infrastructure was made available.
"This is the great leap forward, when China fell."
It was Mao Tse Tung's central planning.
China recovered. Then they said, "Never again stupid central planning."
But they went up here and India tried to follow.
And in fact they found it.
And both countries got better health, but kept a very low economy.
And we come to 1978, and Mao Tse Tung died, and a new type came from the left.
It was Deng Xiaoping who looked at this.
He said, "It doesn't matter whether a cat is black or white as long as it catches mice."
Because mice were catching what the two cats were doing.
You see the two cats here, China and India, who wanted to catch the mice there.
They decided to invest in both health and education, but also to start growing the economy.
The reform of the currency was successful in China.
India implemented a currency reform in 1992.
And they are moving pretty close together, you can see very well that the similarities between India and China are greater than the differences.
And here they march. Will they catch up?
That is the big question today.
Here they are today.
What does this mean -- (Applause) this is the average of China.
(If I were to divide China, you can see: Shanghai has already caught up.)
Shanghai has already achieved it.
And it is healthier than the USA.
Guizhou, one of the poorest rural provinces in China, but here it's down here.
If you divide Guizhou into city and rural areas, the rural areas go down to there.
You see the big inequality within China in the midst of the fast economic growth.
If we look at India, we find another kind of inequality.
The macrogeographic difference is not very big.
The biggest state, Uttar Pradesh is poorer and has a lower health than the rest of India.
Kerala is very high up on the list of health in the USA, but not in the economy.
This is Maharashtra with Mumbai in the rise.
In India there are big differences within the states, and not between the states.
That's not a bad thing.
If you have large inequality, macrogeographic inequality can be more difficult to deal with than if in the same area, there is a growth center, there are also relatively poor people.
No, there is still an inequality. Look at those, the USA.
(Laughing) Oh, they have broken my frame.
Washington, D.C. went outside.
My colleagues at Gapminder wanted me to show you this, because there's a new chief of health in Washington who's really concerned about the health of the country.
I can understand him well because Washington D.C.
It is very rich there, but they are not so healthy as Kerala.
Quite interesting, isn't it?
I see a good business idea for Kerala: help the USA to improve their health care system.
Here we have the whole world. The legend is down there.
If you look at these two huge cats here, you see that between them and in front of them, the entire, rising world economy lies.
You can see that a large part of the world's health care and education is improved. In Africa and other regions, such as rural Guizhou in China, there are still people with poor health and very low income.
(Laughter) There is enormous inequality in the world.
But the majority of the world is making rapid progress.
Back to my sheet.
When will they catch up? I need to use a very conventional graphic.
I will show the per-capita income on this axis, poor down there, rich up here.
And here's the time, starting in 1858. I'm starting the world.
And we'll see what happens with the countries.
Under foreign rule, income in China fell to the level of India.
The United States and Great Britain became richer and richer.
After the Second World War, the USA was richer than Great Britain.
But now comes the independence.
Growth begins, economic reforms.
The growth is faster and with the forecasts of the international currency fund, you can see where they will be in 2014.
When will they catch up?
Look at the United States.
Can you see the bubble?
Not the bubble, not my bubbles, but the financial bubble.
This is the dot-com bubble. This is the Lehman Brothers collapse.
You can see it here.
And here it seems to be the Northern Rock bankruptcy.
These countries seem to be going down a different path.
Instead of growing up, they are growing down.
And people who are interested in growth are now looking at Asia.
I can compare it with Japan. Here comes Japan.
See, Japan has done it.
We add Japan.
(Laughter) RB: Ah, that was quite fun. That was a wonderful car-boat in which -- CA: Oh, that car that we -- actually we -- it was a TEDster event there, I think.
Can you see what Japan did?
Japan made it so that it was finished, and then it went on like the other rich economies.
But the real projections for these, I would say something like this.
Can get worse, can get better.
Predictions are always difficult, especially about the future.
A historian once told me that it's even harder to predict the past.
I think I'm in a difficult position.
I think that inequality in China and India is a really big obstacle, because the whole population in growth and prosperity will create a domestic market, which will prevent social instability, and it will use the whole potential of the population.
(Laughter) Social investments in health, education and infrastructure and electricity, that's really needed in India and China.
You know about the climate. We have big international experts in India who confirm that the climate is changing, and we have to take measures, because otherwise China and India will become countries that suffer most from the climate change.
And I think India and China are the best partners in the world for a good global climate policy.
But they will not pay for what others, who have more money, have largely produced, and I agree with them.
But I am really worried about war.
Will the once rich countries really accept a completely changed world economy, and the power shift from where it was during the last 50 to 100 to 150 years back to Asia?
Will Asia be finished with this new position at the top of the world as the powerful heads of the world?
Always avoid war, because this will always lead to human development going backwards.
If these inequalities, climate change and war can be avoided, you are ready for a world that is equal. This is what it seems to be about to happen.
And this vision that I got as a young student, 1972, that Indians are much better than Swedes, is coming true.
And it will happen exactly in 2048 in the late summer, on July 27.
My 100th birthday is on the 27th of July 2048.
And I'm going to count on it while I'm speaking at the first TEDIndia conference.
They are ready on time. Thank you very much.
From today, you will look at children who will become suicide bombers with very different eyes.
In 2009, there were 500 bomb explosions in Pakistan.
= = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = = =
Please watch this short video from my current documentary film "The Children of the Taliban."
The Taliban are now running their own schools.
They speak to the parents deliberately and convince them to send their children there.
In return, they offer free food and accommodation and sometimes they also pay the family a monthly allowance.
We have received a propaganda video made by the Taliban.
Little boys are taught how to justify suicide attacks and how to hang spies.
I met a kid from Swat who visited a similar Koran school.
Hazrat Ali comes from a poor farming family in Swat.
He joined the Taliban when he was 13 years old.
How does the Taliban in your area get people to join them?
First they will bring us to the mosque and preach to us.
And then they took us to the Koran school and taught us the Koran.
He tells me that the children then received several months of military training.
They're using machine guns, Kalashnikovs, rocket launchers, grenades and bombs.
They are telling us to use them only against unbelievers.
Then they bring us up to speed on how to commit a suicide bombing.
Would you like to commit suicide?
If the Almighty God gives me the power for it.
Even with the Taliban, they perfected their way of recruiting and training children. It’s a five-step process.
The first step is that the Taliban are targeting large families that are poor and live in rural areas.
They separate the parents from their children by promising them food, clothing and a place to live for the children.
Then they send them hundreds of kilometers away to extreme strict schools that are run according to the Taliban's program.
They teach the children the Koran, which is the holiest book of Islam, in Arabic, a language the children don't understand and don't speak.
You especially build on teachers who, like myself, twist the statements to suit their purpose.
These children are expressly forbidden to read newspapers, listen to the radio, or read any books that aren't prescribed by the teachers.
If any child is caught breaking these rules, it will be severely punished.
(Laughter) "In fact, the Taliban have imposed a complete ban on all other sources of information.
The Taliban wants to make these children hate the world in which they live.
That's why they are beating the kids. I saw it. They give them two times a day bread and water. They allow them to play games only for eight hours a day. They tell them that they can do nothing else but read the Koran for eight hours a day.
The children are prisoners. They can't leave school; they can't go home.
Their parents are so poor that they have no way to get them back.
The older members of the Taliban, the fighters, begin to talk about the honor of martyrdom.
They talk about it like if they die, they will be given honey and milk to drink, that there will be 72 virgin girls waiting for them in paradise, that there will be unlimited food there and that this fame will make them heroes of their neighbors.
(Laughter) And actually, this process of brainwashing has begun.
I think the Taliban has one of the most effective propaganda tools.
(Applause) In their videos, which they use, photos are embedded that show men, women and children who die in Iraq, Afghanistan and Pakistan.
The western powers don't care about the dead, and so people who live in areas where western powers are working with them are free wild.
That's why Pakistani civilians, of whom over 6000 have been killed in the last two years alone, are considered wild animals.
Now these children will be prepared to become suicide bombers.
They are ready to go out and fight because they were told that this is the only way to promote Islam.
Please look at another section of my film.
This boy is called Zenola.
He jumped himself into the air and killed six.
This boy is called Sadik.
He killed 22.
This boy is called Messoud.
He killed 28.
The Taliban run schools where they prepare young men to commit war crimes against civilians.
Do you want to commit suicide?
I would very much like that.
But only if I get permission from my father.
If I look at suicide bombers, the younger ones, or in my age, then I feel so inspired by their attacks.
What would you say is the best thing that could happen to you if you were to commit a suicide bombing?
On the most recent day, God will ask me "Why did you do that?"
and I will answer, "My Lord! Just to make you happy!"
"I have dedicated my life to the fight against the unbelievers."
And the all-powerful God will consider my intention.
If it was my intention to destroy the evil for Islam, I will be rewarded with Paradise.
NA: I will leave them all with this thought: If you had grown up in these circumstances, confronted with this decision, would you choose to live in this world or in the glorious afterlife?
As a recruiter for the Taliban, he told me, "There will always be victims in this war."
Thank you.
In my field of work, we believe that pictures can change the world.
(Laughter) We admit we are naive, but also sleepy and lazy, = (Laughter)
We are aware that photographs have caused reactions and have caused changes.
Let's start with some images.
It would surprise me very much if you didn't know many or even most of them.
They could be described as "cultish" in that they have already become cliche.
In fact, they are so well known that you can even recognize them when they come in a different form.
But I think we're looking for more.
We are looking for more.
We are looking for images that focus attention on critical issues, images that are borderless, images that cross religions, images that provoke us, to stand up and do something, in other words, to act.
This picture here you've all seen before.
It has changed our view of the real world.
We have never looked at our planet from this perspective before.
Many attribute the birth of the environmental movement to the first time we saw our planet in this way, so small, so fragile.
Today, 40 years later, many of us here know better than most others what destructive forces our species can bring to our environment.
And so it seems that we are finally going to do something about it.
These destructive forces take many forms.
Let's take for example these photos here from the Congo:
These gorillas were killed, some would even say crucified, and it is not surprising that they caused worldwide outrage.
We were reminded of the destructive power of nature when the last earthquake in Haiti struck.
What I find even worse is the destructive power of the human being against himself.
The Holocaust teaches us that nature, even in its most brutal moments, is still kind compared to man when he loses his moral orientation and reason.
Here's another cross-coupling.
Both the shocking images of Abu Ghraib and the images of Guantanamo have shocked the world.
The first time that we published these images, not the images themselves, was the reason that a government changed its policy.
Some people claim that those images were the ones that started the uproar in Iraq more than any other single act.
More than that: these images have forever disproved the so-called high moral claims of the occupying powers.
Let's go back a little.
In the 1960s and 1970s, when the Vietnam War was being broadcast into American living rooms every day.
The images confronted the viewers directly with the victims of the war: a little girl burned by napalm, a student killed by the National Guard during a protest at the Kent State University in Ohio.
In fact, these images themselves became voices of protest.
But images also have the power to cast a more understanding light on mistrust and ignorance, especially when it comes to HIV/AIDS. That's why I'm going to show you this one image.
In the 80s, the stigma of this disease was an enormous obstacle to discussing it or even mentioning it.
Princess Diana's gesture of touching the baby with HIV was a very powerful way of breaking down the stigma of HIV.
She knew the power of a photograph better than most of us.
If we're confronted with a shocking image, we have the choice to look away, or to confront it.
Fortunately, these photos, when they appeared in the "Guardian" in 1998, generated a lot of attention and ultimately a lot of money to fight famine in Sudan.
Have these pictures changed the world?
No, but they did a great effect.
Pictures often move us to question our inner principles and our responsibility to each other.
We all saw the photos of Katrina, and I think millions of people were very moved by them.
so that I think it's highly unlikely that these images were not in the minds of the American people when they went to the polls in November 2008.
Unfortunately, some very important images were held back for being too dramatic and disturbing.
I will show you a picture of a veteran of the Iraq war, a picture that Eugene Richards shot and that is from a brilliant work that is called "War is personal" and never published.
But pictures don't have to be dramatic to remind us of the tragedy of war.
John Moore made this photo at Arlington Cemetery.
After all the aggressive moments of fighting in all the crisis areas of this world, there is also this picture of a much more peaceful place that follows me much more than the others.
Ansel Adam said, but I don't agree with him: "You don't take a photo, you make it."
I think it's not the photographer who takes the photo, but we ourselves.
We bring in every picture our own values and convictions, with the result that the picture in us swings.
My company has 70 million pictures.
One of them is in my office.
Here it is.
I hope you'll understand the next time you see a picture that upsets you, why. And as I see it, I'm sure you'll do something about it.
Thank you to all the photographers.
There's no applause.
